1110 | granddaughter (noun): the daughter of your son or daughter | loc: kız torun
  EN TS: Kisses from a granddaughter!
  tr TS: Kız torundan öpücükler!
  EN FS: Kisses from a grandson!
  tr FS: Erkek torundan öpücükler!
  EN TP: a granddaughter's kiss
  tr TP: kız torunun öpücüğü
  EN FP: a granddaughter's drawing
  tr FP: kız torunun çizimi
1112 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: büyükanne
  EN TS: Grandmother is making bread.
  tr TS: Büyükanne ekmek yapıyor.
  EN FS: Grandmother is making soup.
  tr FS: Büyükanne çorba yapıyor.
  EN TP: baking with grandmother
  tr TP: büyükanneyle ekmek pişirmek
  EN FP: knitting with grandmother
  tr FP: büyükanneyle örgü örmek
1115 | greece (noun): a sunny country in the south of Europe | loc: Yunanistan
  EN TS: Dancing in Greece? Nice style.
  tr TS: Yunanistan'da dans mı? Tarzın güzel.
  EN FS: Diving in Greece? Nice style.
  tr FS: Yunanistan'da dalış mı? Tarzın güzel.
  EN TP: dancing in Greece
  tr TP: Yunanistan'da dans
  EN FP: swimming in Greece
  tr FP: Yunanistan'da yüzmek
1116 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: damat
  EN TS: The groom is carrying her.
  tr TS: Damat onu kucağında taşıyor.
  EN FS: The groom is carrying a cake.
  tr FS: Damat bir pasta taşıyor.
  EN TP: a groom carrying his bride
  tr TP: gelinini taşıyan damat
  EN FP: a groom brushing a horse
  tr FP: at tımarlayan damat
1119 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: rehber
  EN TS: The guide is leading the tour.
  tr TS: Rehber tura öncülük ediyor.
  EN FS: The guide is leading the race.
  tr FS: Rehber yarışa öncülük ediyor.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiyeli bir rehber
  EN FP: a mountain guide climbing
  tr FP: tırmanan bir dağ rehberi
1120 | guy (noun): a man, often a young one | loc: adam
  EN TS: This guy is tossing his keys, so cool.
  tr TS: Bu adam anahtarlarını havaya atıyor, çok havalı.
  EN FS: This guy is tossing his phone, so cool.
  tr FS: Bu adam telefonunu havaya atıyor, çok havalı.
  EN TP: a guy with a pizza
  tr TP: pizzalı bir adam
  EN FP: a guy with a guitar
  tr FP: gitarlı bir adam
1123 | hallway (noun): a long narrow space with doors to rooms | loc: koridor
  EN TS: Her hallway is a dance floor!
  tr TS: Onun koridoru resmen dans pisti!
  EN FS: Her kitchen is a dance floor!
  tr FS: Onun mutfağı resmen dans pisti!
  EN TP: dancing down a hallway
  tr TP: koridorda dans etmek
  EN FP: running down a hallway
  tr FP: koridorda koşmak
1125 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: liman
  EN TS: Boats rest in the harbour.
  tr TS: Tekneler limanda dinleniyor.
  EN FS: Boats rest on the beach.
  tr FS: Tekneler kumsalda dinleniyor.
  EN TP: boats in the harbour
  tr TP: limandaki tekneler
  EN FP: boats in the canal
  tr FP: kanaldaki tekneler
1126 | headache (noun): a pain in your head | loc: baş ağrısı
  EN TS: Work gave him a headache.
  tr TS: İş ona baş ağrısı yaptı.
  EN FS: Music gave him a headache.
  tr FS: Müzik ona baş ağrısı yaptı.
  EN TP: a headache at night
  tr TP: gece baş ağrısı
  EN FP: a headache in the sun
  tr FP: güneşte baş ağrısı
1127 | health (noun): the state of your body, being well and not ill | loc: sağlık
  EN TS: Pure health and happiness!
  tr TS: Saf sağlık ve mutluluk!
  EN FS: Pure rain and darkness!
  tr FS: Saf yağmur ve karanlık!
  EN TP: full of health and joy
  tr TP: sağlık ve neşe dolu
  EN FP: a health check
  tr FP: bir sağlık kontrolü
1129 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: kalp
  EN TS: The doctor is holding a heart!
  tr TS: Doktor bir kalp tutuyor!
  EN FS: The doctor is holding a brain!
  tr FS: Doktor bir beyin tutuyor!
  EN TP: a model of a heart
  tr TP: bir kalp maketi
  EN FP: a model of a brain
  tr FP: bir beyin maketi
1131 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: topuk
  EN TS: Both heels are off the floor.
  tr TS: İki topuk da yerden kalkmış.
  EN FS: Both heels are on the floor.
  tr FS: İki topuk da yerde.
  EN TP: lifting both heels
  tr TP: iki topuğu kaldırmak
  EN FP: wearing high heels
  tr FP: yüksek topuklu giymek
1133 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: yardımcı
  EN TS: The helper has her bag.
  tr TS: Yardımcının yanında çantası var.
  EN FS: The helper has her dog.
  tr FS: Yardımcının yanında köpeği var.
  EN TP: a helper with her bag
  tr TP: çantasıyla bir yardımcı
  EN FP: a helper in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir yardımcı
1134 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: tepe
  EN TS: Guess who is having lunch on the hill? The sheep.
  tr TS: Bil bakalım tepede kim öğle yemeği yiyor? Koyunlar.
  EN FS: Guess who is having lunch on the hill? The cows.
  tr FS: Bil bakalım tepede kim öğle yemeği yiyor? İnekler.
  EN TP: a tree on the hill
  tr TP: tepede bir ağaç
  EN FP: a house on the hill
  tr FP: tepede bir ev
1135 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: kalça
  EN TS: Her hand is on her hip.
  tr TS: Eli kalçasında.
  EN FS: Her hand is on her head.
  tr FS: Eli başında.
  EN TP: a hand on her hip
  tr TP: kalçasında bir el
  EN FP: a hand on his shoulder
  tr FP: omzunda bir el
1136 | home (noun): the house or flat someone is living in | loc: ev
  EN TS: He is finally home!
  tr TS: Sonunda evde!
  EN FS: He is finally at work!
  tr FS: Sonunda işte!
  EN TP: coming home with a bag
  tr TP: çantayla eve gelmek
  EN FP: leaving home with a bag
  tr FP: çantayla evden çıkmak
1138 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: hastane
  EN TS: Quiet day at the hospital.
  tr TS: Hastanede sakin bir gün.
  EN FS: Quiet day at the airport.
  tr FS: Havalimanında sakin bir gün.
  EN TP: a bright hospital corridor
  tr TP: aydınlık bir hastane koridoru
  EN FP: a full hospital ward
  tr FP: dolu bir hastane koğuşu
1139 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: ev sahibi
  EN TS: The host is making a toast.
  tr TS: Ev sahibi kadeh kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: The host is making a cake.
  tr FS: Ev sahibi pasta yapıyor.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  tr TP: kadeh kaldıran ev sahibi
  EN FP: a TV show host
  tr FP: bir TV programı sunucusu
1141 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: otel
  EN TS: A guest is leaving the hotel.
  tr TS: Bir misafir otelden çıkıyor.
  EN FS: A guest is entering the hotel.
  tr FS: Bir misafir otele giriyor.
  EN TP: leaving a grand hotel
  tr TP: görkemli bir otelden çıkmak
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında bir otel
1143 | human (noun): a person; a member of mankind | loc: insan
  EN TS: There's just one human here.
  tr TS: Burada sadece tek bir insan var.
  EN FS: There's just one camel here.
  tr FS: Burada sadece tek bir deve var.
  EN TP: one human in the desert
  tr TP: çölde tek bir insan
  EN FP: a crowd of humans
  tr FP: bir insan kalabalığı
1144 | hunter (noun): a person who hunts wild animals | loc: avcı
  EN TS: The hunter is kneeling.
  tr TS: Avcı diz çökmüş.
  EN FS: The hunter is running.
  tr FS: Avcı koşuyor.
  EN TP: a hunter with binoculars
  tr TP: dürbünlü bir avcı
  EN FP: a hunter with a rifle
  tr FP: tüfekli bir avcı
1147 | infection (noun): a sore red swelling caused by germs | loc: enfeksiyon
  EN TS: His elbow has an infection.
  tr TS: Dirseğinde enfeksiyon var.
  EN FS: His knee has an infection.
  tr FS: Dizinde enfeksiyon var.
  EN TP: an infection on the elbow
  tr TP: dirsekte bir enfeksiyon
  EN FP: an infection in the eye
  tr FP: gözde bir enfeksiyon
1148 | injection (noun): medicine put into the body with a needle | loc: enjeksiyon
  EN TS: The injection is ready. Run!
  tr TS: Enjeksiyon hazır. Kaç!
  EN FS: The bandage is ready. Run!
  tr FS: Bandaj hazır. Kaç!
  EN TP: a tray for an injection
  tr TP: enjeksiyon için bir tepsi
  EN FP: a tray ready for dinner
  tr FP: yemeğe hazır bir tepsi
1149 | insomnia (noun): not being able to fall asleep at night | loc: uykusuzluk
  EN TS: Insomnia: him versus the ceiling.
  tr TS: Uykusuzluk: o tavana karşı.
  EN FS: Insomnia: him versus the fridge.
  tr FS: Uykusuzluk: o buzdolabına karşı.
  EN TP: insomnia in the night
  tr TP: gece uykusuzluğu
  EN FP: insomnia before an exam
  tr FP: sınav öncesi uykusuzluk
1151 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: ütü
  EN TS: His iron is steaming.
  tr TS: Ütüsü buhar çıkarıyor.
  EN FS: His kettle is steaming.
  tr FS: Su ısıtıcısı buhar çıkarıyor.
  EN TP: a steaming iron
  tr TP: buhar çıkaran bir ütü
  EN FP: an iron gate
  tr FP: demir bir kapı
1152 | ironing board (noun): a tall folding table for smoothing clothes flat | loc: ütü masası
  EN TS: An ironing board is going up.
  tr TS: Bir ütü masası kuruluyor.
  EN FS: A beach chair is going up.
  tr FS: Bir şezlong kuruluyor.
  EN TP: setting up an ironing board
  tr TP: ütü masası kurmak
  EN FP: sitting on an ironing board
  tr FP: ütü masasına oturmak
1154 | journalist (noun): a person who writes or reports the news | loc: gazeteci
  EN TS: The journalist wants answers.
  tr TS: Gazeteci cevap istiyor.
  EN FS: The doctor wants answers.
  tr FS: Doktor cevap istiyor.
  EN TP: a journalist with a recorder
  tr TP: ses kayıt cihazlı gazeteci
  EN FP: a journalist at a desk
  tr FP: masa başında bir gazeteci
1156 | jungle (noun): a thick tropical forest full of vines | loc: cangıl
  EN TS: The parrot runs this jungle.
  tr TS: Bu cangılın patronu papağan.
  EN FS: The monkey runs this jungle.
  tr FS: Bu cangılın patronu maymun.
  EN TP: a parrot in the jungle
  tr TP: cangılda bir papağan
  EN FP: a parrot in a cage
  tr FP: kafeste bir papağan
1158 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: su ısıtıcısı
  EN TS: Kettle water is hot. Who knew?
  tr TS: Su ısıtıcısındaki su sıcakmış. Kimin aklına gelirdi?
  EN FS: Tap water is hot. Who knew?
  tr FS: Musluk suyu sıcakmış. Kimin aklına gelirdi?
  EN TP: pouring from a kettle
  tr TP: su ısıtıcısından dökmek
  EN FP: a kettle on the stove
  tr FP: ocakta bir su ısıtıcısı
1159 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: anahtar
  EN TS: Here is your room key.
  tr TS: Buyurun, oda anahtarınız.
  EN FS: Here is your car key.
  tr FS: Buyurun, araba anahtarınız.
  EN TP: a hotel room key
  tr TP: bir otel odası anahtarı
  EN FP: a car key
  tr FP: bir araba anahtarı
1160 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: mutfak
  EN TS: The kitchen is well equipped.
  tr TS: Mutfak çok iyi donanımlı.
  EN FS: The kitchen is almost empty.
  tr FS: Mutfak neredeyse boş.
  EN TP: a bright kitchen
  tr TP: aydınlık bir mutfak
  EN FP: a dark kitchen
  tr FP: karanlık bir mutfak
1161 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: diz
  EN TS: He is putting ice on his knee.
  tr TS: Dizine buz koyuyor.
  EN FS: He is putting ice on his head.
  tr FS: Başına buz koyuyor.
  EN TP: ice on a bent knee
  tr TP: bükülü dizde buz
  EN FP: down on one knee
  tr FP: tek diz üstünde
1163 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: hanımefendi
  EN TS: The lady has white gloves on.
  tr TS: Hanımefendi beyaz eldiven giymiş.
  EN FS: The lady has black gloves on.
  tr FS: Hanımefendi siyah eldiven giymiş.
  EN TP: a lady on the stairs
  tr TP: merdivende bir hanımefendi
  EN FP: a lady at the bar
  tr FP: barda bir hanımefendi
1166 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: lamba
  EN TS: She is moving a big lamp.
  tr TS: Büyük bir lambayı taşıyor.
  EN FS: She is moving a big plant.
  tr FS: Büyük bir bitkiyi taşıyor.
  EN TP: a lamp for the table
  tr TP: bir masa lambası
  EN FP: a lamp for the garden
  tr FP: bir bahçe lambası
1167 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: avukat
  EN TS: The lawyer has a lot of books.
  tr TS: Avukatın bir sürü kitabı var.
  EN FS: The lawyer has a lot of cats.
  tr FS: Avukatın bir sürü kedisi var.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a folder
  tr TP: dosyalı bir avukat
  EN FP: a lawyer in a courtroom
  tr FP: mahkeme salonunda bir avukat
1170 | librarian (noun): a person whose job is looking after books | loc: kütüphaneci
  EN TS: The librarian is on a ladder.
  tr TS: Kütüphaneci merdivenin üstünde.
  EN FS: The librarian is on a table.
  tr FS: Kütüphaneci masanın üstünde.
  EN TP: a librarian on a ladder
  tr TP: merdivende bir kütüphaneci
  EN FP: a librarian at a computer
  tr FP: bilgisayar başında bir kütüphaneci
1173 | lightning (noun): the bright electric flash in a storm sky | loc: şimşek
  EN TS: Lightning is hitting the sea!
  tr TS: Şimşek denize çarpıyor!
  EN FS: Lightning is hitting a tree!
  tr FS: Şimşek bir ağaca çarpıyor!
  EN TP: lightning over the sea
  tr TP: denizin üstünde şimşek
  EN FP: lightning over a city
  tr FP: şehrin üstünde şimşek
1175 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: oturma odası
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying all over the living room.
  tr TS: Patlamış mısır oturma odasının her yerinde uçuşuyor.
  EN FS: Popcorn is flying all over the kitchen.
  tr FS: Patlamış mısır mutfağın her yerinde uçuşuyor.
  EN TP: friends in a living room
  tr TP: oturma odasında arkadaşlar
  EN FP: friends in a waiting room
  tr FP: bekleme salonunda arkadaşlar
1178 | loser (noun): the person or team that does not win | loc: kaybeden
  EN TS: The loser is under a towel.
  tr TS: Kaybeden havlunun altında.
  EN FS: The loser is under a table.
  tr FS: Kaybeden masanın altında.
  EN TP: the loser of the match
  tr TP: maçı kaybeden
  EN FP: the loser of the race
  tr FP: yarışı kaybeden
1179 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: bagaj
  EN TS: Too much luggage for one man.
  tr TS: Tek bir adam için fazla bagaj.
  EN FS: Too much luggage for one girl.
  tr FS: Tek bir kız için fazla bagaj.
  EN TP: a trolley full of luggage
  tr TP: bagaj dolu bir el arabası
  EN FP: luggage on a car roof
  tr FP: araba tavanında bagaj
1180 | luggage tag (noun): a small label tied to a suitcase | loc: bagaj etiketi
  EN TS: The luggage tag is blank.
  tr TS: Bagaj etiketi boş.
  EN FS: The luggage tag is red.
  tr FS: Bagaj etiketi kırmızı.
  EN TP: tying on a luggage tag
  tr TP: bagaj etiketi bağlamak
  EN FP: cutting off a luggage tag
  tr FP: bagaj etiketini kesip çıkarmak
1182 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: oda görevlisi
  EN TS: The maid is making the bed.
  tr TS: Oda görevlisi yatağı yapıyor.
  EN FS: The maid is making coffee.
  tr FS: Oda görevlisi kahve yapıyor.
  EN TP: a maid making a bed
  tr TP: yatak yapan oda görevlisi
  EN FP: a maid at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde bir oda görevlisi
1183 | male (adjective): being a man or a boy | loc: erkek
  EN TS: A male athlete is rowing.
  tr TS: Erkek bir sporcu kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: A female athlete is rowing.
  tr FS: Kadın bir sporcu kürek çekiyor.
  EN TP: a male rower
  tr TP: erkek bir kürekçi
  EN FP: a male swimmer
  tr FP: erkek bir yüzücü
1185 | manager (noun): the person in charge who tells a team what to do | loc: yönetici
  EN TS: The manager is giving orders.
  tr TS: Yönetici talimat veriyor.
  EN FS: The manager is giving gifts.
  tr FS: Yönetici hediye veriyor.
  EN TP: a manager with a laptop
  tr TP: laptoplu bir yönetici
  EN FP: a manager with a phone
  tr FP: telefonlu bir yönetici
1188 | married (adjective): having a husband or wife | loc: evli
  EN TS: They just got married and are already dancing.
  tr TS: Yeni evliler ve şimdiden dans ediyorlar.
  EN FS: They just got married and are already fighting.
  tr FS: Yeni evliler ve şimdiden kavga ediyorlar.
  EN TP: a married couple dancing
  tr TP: dans eden evli bir çift
  EN FP: a married couple arguing
  tr FP: tartışan evli bir çift
1189 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: yatak
  EN TS: They are carrying a mattress.
  tr TS: Bir yatak taşıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are carrying a piano.
  tr FS: Bir piyano taşıyorlar.
  EN TP: a mattress up the stairs
  tr TP: merdivenden çıkan bir yatak
  EN FP: a mattress on the floor
  tr FP: yerde bir yatak
1193 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: ilaç
  EN TS: Open wide for the medicine.
  tr TS: Aç ağzını, ilaç geliyor.
  EN FS: Open wide for the ice cream.
  tr FS: Aç ağzını, dondurma geliyor.
  EN TP: liquid medicine on a spoon
  tr TP: kaşıkta sıvı ilaç
  EN FP: medicine in a pill box
  tr FP: hap kutusunda ilaç
1195 | mexican (adjective): from the country south of the United States | loc: Meksikalı | translator note: loc Meksikalı is for people; used Meksika for food/things
  EN TS: A flying Mexican tortilla!
  tr TS: Uçan bir Meksika tortillası!
  EN FS: A flying Mexican taco!
  tr FS: Uçan bir Meksika tacosu!
  EN TP: a Mexican street stall
  tr TP: bir Meksika sokak tezgâhı
  EN FP: a Mexican restaurant
  tr FP: bir Meksika restoranı
1198 | model (noun): a person who poses for a photographer | loc: manken
  EN TS: The model owns the runway.
  tr TS: Manken podyumun hakimi.
  EN FS: The model owns the beach.
  tr FS: Manken plajın hakimi.
  EN TP: a model on a runway
  tr TP: podyumda bir manken
  EN FP: a model of a plane
  tr FP: bir uçak maketi
1200 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: sabah
  EN TS: She loves this sunny morning.
  tr TS: Bu güneşli sabaha bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She loves this rainy morning.
  tr FS: Bu yağmurlu sabaha bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a sunny morning
  tr TP: güneşli bir sabah
  EN FP: a rainy morning
  tr FP: yağmurlu bir sabah
1202 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: anne
  EN TS: Mother and baby: nose to nose.
  tr TS: Anne ve bebek: burun buruna.
  EN FS: Mother and dog: nose to nose.
  tr FS: Anne ve köpek: burun buruna.
  EN TP: a mother lifting her baby
  tr TP: bebeğini havaya kaldıran anne
  EN FP: a mother feeding her baby
  tr FP: bebeğini besleyen anne
1203 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: motosiklet
  EN TS: His motorbike is sparking!
  tr TS: Motosikletinden kıvılcımlar çıkıyor!
  EN FS: His scooter is sparking!
  tr FS: Scooter'ından kıvılcımlar çıkıyor!
  EN TP: a motorbike in a curve
  tr TP: virajda bir motosiklet
  EN FP: a motorbike in a garage
  tr FP: garajda bir motosiklet
1206 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: çamur
  EN TS: Mud is flying everywhere!
  tr TS: Çamur her yere uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: Snow is flying everywhere!
  tr FS: Kar her yere uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: a shoe in deep mud
  tr TP: derin çamurda bir ayakkabı
  EN FP: a shoe in fresh snow
  tr FP: taze karda bir ayakkabı
1208 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: müze
  EN TS: A dinosaur in the museum!
  tr TS: Müzede bir dinozor!
  EN FS: A whale in the museum!
  tr FS: Müzede bir balina!
  EN TP: a dinosaur in a museum
  tr TP: müzede bir dinozor
  EN FP: a museum of modern art
  tr FP: bir modern sanat müzesi
1211 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: millet
  EN TS: A whole nation singing as one.
  tr TS: Koca bir millet hep bir ağızdan şarkı söylüyor.
  EN FS: A whole nation dancing as one.
  tr FS: Koca bir millet hep birlikte dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a nation singing together
  tr TP: birlikte şarkı söyleyen millet
  EN FP: a nation of coffee lovers
  tr FP: kahve tutkunu bir millet
1213 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: mide bulantısı
  EN TS: Big waves, big nausea.
  tr TS: Büyük dalgalar, büyük mide bulantısı.
  EN FS: Small waves, big nausea.
  tr FS: Küçük dalgalar, büyük mide bulantısı.
  EN TP: nausea on a rough sea
  tr TP: dalgalı denizde mide bulantısı
  EN FP: nausea after a big meal
  tr FP: ağır yemekten sonra mide bulantısı
1214 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: boyun
  EN TS: She is stretching her neck.
  tr TS: Boynunu esnetiyor.
  EN FS: She is stretching her leg.
  tr FS: Bacağını esnetiyor.
  EN TP: a long stretched neck
  tr TP: uzun, esnetilmiş bir boyun
  EN FP: a scarf around the neck
  tr FP: boyunda bir atkı
1215 | neighbor (noun): a person who lives next door or near you | loc: komşu
  EN TS: The neighbors are chatting.
  tr TS: Komşular sohbet ediyor.
  EN FS: The neighbors are fighting.
  tr FS: Komşular kavga ediyor.
  EN TP: neighbors at the garden fence
  tr TP: bahçe çitinde komşular
  EN FP: a noisy neighbor
  tr FP: gürültücü bir komşu
1216 | netherlands (noun): a flat country in Europe with tulips and windmills | loc: Hollanda
  EN TS: Bike, tulips, windmills. Yes, the Netherlands.
  tr TS: Bisiklet, lale, yel değirmeni. Evet, Hollanda.
  EN FS: Car, tulips, windmills. Yes, the Netherlands.
  tr FS: Araba, lale, yel değirmeni. Evet, Hollanda.
  EN TP: tulips in the Netherlands
  tr TP: Hollanda'da laleler
  EN FP: a market in the Netherlands
  tr FP: Hollanda'da bir pazar
1218 | no one (phrase): not a single person | loc: hiç kimse
  EN TS: No one is on the playground. Creepy!
  tr TS: Oyun parkında hiç kimse yok. Ürkütücü!
  EN FS: Kids are on the playground. Creepy!
  tr FS: Oyun parkında çocuklar var. Ürkütücü!
  EN TP: no one on the swings
  tr TP: salıncaklarda hiç kimse yok
  EN FP: no one on the beach
  tr FP: plajda hiç kimse yok
1219 | nobody (phrase): not any person at all | loc: hiç kimse
  EN TS: Nobody came. Great party.
  tr TS: Hiç kimse gelmedi. Süper parti.
  EN FS: Everybody came. Great party.
  tr FS: Herkes geldi. Süper parti.
  EN TP: nobody at the table
  tr TP: masada hiç kimse yok
  EN FP: a crowded dinner table
  tr FP: kalabalık bir yemek masası
1221 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: subay
  EN TS: The officer is saluting.
  tr TS: Subay selam veriyor.
  EN FS: The officer is dancing.
  tr FS: Subay dans ediyor.
  EN TP: an officer saluting
  tr TP: selam veren bir subay
  EN FP: an officer driving
  tr FP: araba süren bir subay
1225 | painter (noun): a person who puts colour on walls as a job | loc: boyacı
  EN TS: The painter really loves teal.
  tr TS: Boyacı petrol mavisine bayılıyor.
  EN FS: The painter really loves pink.
  tr FS: Boyacı pembeye bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a painter on a ladder
  tr TP: merdivende bir boyacı
  EN FP: a painter at an easel
  tr FP: şövale başında bir boyacı
1227 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: ebeveyn
  EN TS: Parent mode: jogging.
  tr TS: Ebeveyn modu: koşu.
  EN FS: Parent mode: sleeping.
  tr FS: Ebeveyn modu: uyku.
  EN TP: a parent beside a bike
  tr TP: bisikletin yanında bir ebeveyn
  EN FP: a parent fixing a bike
  tr FP: bisiklet tamir eden ebeveyn
1230 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: yolcu
  EN TS: The passenger is fast asleep.
  tr TS: Yolcu mışıl mışıl uyuyor.
  EN FS: The passenger is wide awake.
  tr FS: Yolcu fincan gibi gözlerle uyanık.
  EN TP: a sleeping train passenger
  tr TP: uyuyan bir tren yolcusu
  EN FP: a passenger in a taxi
  tr FP: takside bir yolcu
1232 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: hasta
  EN TS: The patient is breathing in.
  tr TS: Hasta nefes alıyor.
  EN FS: The patient is eating lunch.
  tr FS: Hasta öğle yemeği yiyor.
  EN TP: a patient breathing deeply
  tr TP: derin nefes alan bir hasta
  EN FP: a patient in bed
  tr FP: yatakta bir hasta
1233 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: yaya
  EN TS: The pedestrian has a coffee.
  tr TS: Yayanın kahvesi var.
  EN FS: The pedestrian has a dog.
  tr FS: Yayanın köpeği var.
  EN TP: a pedestrian with coffee
  tr TP: kahveli bir yaya
  EN FP: a pedestrian bridge
  tr FP: bir yaya köprüsü
1235 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: insanlar | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: People are cheering!
  tr TS: İnsanlar tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: People are crying!
  tr FS: İnsanlar ağlıyor!
  EN TP: people cheering at night
  tr TP: gece tezahürat yapan insanlar
  EN FP: people cheering in a stadium
  tr FP: stadyumda tezahürat yapan insanlar
1237 | person (noun): a man, woman or child | loc: kişi
  EN TS: Such a "busy" crossing: one person.
  tr TS: Ne "kalabalık" bir yaya geçidi: tek kişi.
  EN FS: Such a "busy" crossing: one dog.
  tr FS: Ne "kalabalık" bir yaya geçidi: tek köpek.
  EN TP: one person on the crosswalk
  tr TP: yaya geçidinde tek kişi
  EN FP: one person on the bus
  tr FP: otobüste tek kişi
1238 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: eczane
  EN TS: The pharmacy has lots of jars.
  tr TS: Eczanede bir sürü kavanoz var.
  EN FS: The pharmacy has lots of toys.
  tr FS: Eczanede bir sürü oyuncak var.
  EN TP: a cozy old pharmacy
  tr TP: şirin, eski bir eczane
  EN FP: a red cross pharmacy
  tr FP: kızıl haçlı bir eczane
1241 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: fotoğrafçı
  EN TS: The photographer is lying in the wet street!
  tr TS: Fotoğrafçı ıslak sokakta yatıyor!
  EN FS: The photographer is standing in the wet street!
  tr FS: Fotoğrafçı ıslak sokakta ayakta duruyor!
  EN TP: a photographer on the ground
  tr TP: yerde bir fotoğrafçı
  EN FP: a photographer in a studio
  tr FP: stüdyoda bir fotoğrafçı
1242 | picture (noun): a photo or drawing, often in a frame | loc: tablo
  EN TS: She is hanging a picture.
  tr TS: Bir tablo asıyor.
  EN FS: She is hanging a mirror.
  tr FS: Bir ayna asıyor.
  EN TP: a picture on the wall
  tr TP: duvarda bir tablo
  EN FP: a picture on her phone
  tr FP: telefonunda bir tablo
1248 | planet (noun): a large round world that circles a star | loc: gezegen
  EN TS: The planet has rings!
  tr TS: Gezegenin halkaları var!
  EN FS: The planet has no rings!
  tr FS: Gezegenin hiç halkası yok!
  EN TP: a ringed planet
  tr TP: halkalı bir gezegen
  EN FP: a planet on a map
  tr FP: haritada bir gezegen
1254 | plumber (noun): a worker who fixes pipes and sinks | loc: tesisatçı
  EN TS: The plumber is fixing a pipe.
  tr TS: Tesisatçı bir boruyu tamir ediyor.
  EN FS: The plumber is fixing a door.
  tr FS: Tesisatçı bir kapıyı tamir ediyor.
  EN TP: a plumber under a sink
  tr TP: lavabonun altında bir tesisatçı
  EN FP: a plumber on a roof
  tr FP: çatıda bir tesisatçı
1255 | poland (noun): a country in central Europe, east of Germany | loc: Polonya
  EN TS: It is winter in Poland.
  tr TS: Polonya'da kış var.
  EN FS: It is summer in Poland.
  tr FS: Polonya'da yaz var.
  EN TP: a snowy square in Poland
  tr TP: Polonya'da karlı bir meydan
  EN FP: a sandy beach in Poland
  tr FP: Polonya'da kumlu bir plaj
1256 | police officer (noun): a person in uniform who makes people obey the law | loc: polis memuru
  EN TS: The police officer is smiling.
  tr TS: Polis memuru gülümsüyor.
  EN FS: The police officer is crying.
  tr FS: Polis memuru ağlıyor.
  EN TP: a police officer pointing
  tr TP: işaret eden bir polis memuru
  EN FP: a police officer running
  tr FP: koşan bir polis memuru
1258 | polish (adjective): from Poland or connected to its people | loc: Polonyalı | translator note: loc Polonyalı is for people; used Polonya for food
  EN TS: She made Polish dumplings.
  tr TS: Polonya mantısı yapmış.
  EN FS: She made Polish sausages.
  tr FS: Polonya sucuğu yapmış.
  EN TP: Polish dumplings in rows
  tr TP: sıra sıra Polonya mantısı
  EN FP: Polish sausages on a grill
  tr FP: ızgarada Polonya sucuğu
1260 | portugal (noun): a country in the far west of Europe, next to Spain | loc: Portekiz
  EN TS: She is running in Portugal.
  tr TS: Portekiz'de koşuyor.
  EN FS: She is cycling in Portugal.
  tr FS: Portekiz'de bisiklet sürüyor.
  EN TP: running in Portugal
  tr TP: Portekiz'de koşu
  EN FP: riding a tram in Portugal
  tr FP: Portekiz'de tramvaya binmek
1262 | portuguese (adjective): from Portugal or connected to its people | loc: Portekiz
  EN TS: Cinnamon on Portuguese tarts!
  tr TS: Portekiz tartlarına tarçın!
  EN FS: Chocolate on Portuguese tarts!
  tr FS: Portekiz tartlarına çikolata!
  EN TP: Portuguese custard tarts
  tr TP: Portekiz muhallebili tartları
  EN FP: Portuguese sardines
  tr FP: Portekiz sardalyaları
1263 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: postacı
  EN TS: The postman is delivering letters.
  tr TS: Postacı mektup dağıtıyor.
  EN FS: The postman is delivering pizzas.
  tr FS: Postacı pizza dağıtıyor.
  EN TP: a postman at a door
  tr TP: kapıda bir postacı
  EN FP: a postman in a van
  tr FP: kamyonette bir postacı
1266 | president (noun): the leader of a country or a big company | loc: başkan
  EN TS: The president is speaking and the cameras are flashing!
  tr TS: Başkan konuşuyor, flaşlar patlıyor!
  EN FS: The president is singing and the cameras are flashing!
  tr FS: Başkan şarkı söylüyor, flaşlar patlıyor!
  EN TP: a president giving a speech
  tr TP: konuşma yapan bir başkan
  EN FP: a president shaking hands
  tr FP: tokalaşan bir başkan
1267 | professional (adjective): smart and serious in the way you work or look | loc: profesyonel
  EN TS: She looks very professional.
  tr TS: Çok profesyonel görünüyor.
  EN FS: She looks very sleepy.
  tr FS: Çok uykulu görünüyor.
  EN TP: a professional look
  tr TP: profesyonel bir görünüm
  EN FP: a professional athlete
  tr FP: profesyonel bir sporcu
1268 | professor (noun): a teacher of the highest rank at a university | loc: profesör
  EN TS: The professor is lecturing.
  tr TS: Profesör ders anlatıyor.
  EN FS: The professor is sleeping.
  tr FS: Profesör uyuyor.
  EN TP: a professor lecturing
  tr TP: ders anlatan bir profesör
  EN FP: a professor's office
  tr FP: profesörün odası
1270 | puddle (noun): a small pool of rain water on the ground | loc: su birikintisi
  EN TS: She is stomping in a puddle.
  tr TS: Su birikintisinde tepiniyor.
  EN FS: She is stomping in the snow.
  tr FS: Karda tepiniyor.
  EN TP: stomping into a puddle
  tr TP: su birikintisine zıplamak
  EN FP: a puddle of spilled milk
  tr FP: dökülmüş süt birikintisi
1274 | rainbow (noun): an arc of colours in the sky after a shower | loc: gökkuşağı
  EN TS: A huge rainbow over the hills.
  tr TS: Tepelerin üstünde kocaman bir gökkuşağı.
  EN FS: A huge rainbow over the sea.
  tr FS: Denizin üstünde kocaman bir gökkuşağı.
  EN TP: a rainbow over green hills
  tr TP: yeşil tepelerde gökkuşağı
  EN FP: a rainbow over a city
  tr FP: şehrin üstünde gökkuşağı
1275 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: kızarıklık
  EN TS: He is scratching his rash.
  tr TS: Kızarıklığını kaşıyor.
  EN FS: He is scratching his head.
  tr FS: Başını kaşıyor.
  EN TP: scratching a red rash
  tr TP: kırmızı kızarıklığı kaşımak
  EN FP: a rash on his face
  tr FP: yüzünde kızarıklık
1278 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: resepsiyon
  EN TS: Reception has a brass bell.
  tr TS: Resepsiyonda pirinç bir zil var.
  EN FS: Reception has a brass lamp.
  tr FS: Resepsiyonda pirinç bir lamba var.
  EN TP: a key at reception
  tr TP: resepsiyonda bir anahtar
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  tr FP: bir düğün resepsiyonu
1286 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: çatı
  EN TS: A worker is clearing the roof.
  tr TS: Bir işçi çatıyı temizliyor.
  EN FS: A worker is painting the roof.
  tr FS: Bir işçi çatıyı boyuyor.
  EN TP: a tiled house roof
  tr TP: kiremitli bir ev çatısı
  EN FP: a glass station roof
  tr FP: camlı bir istasyon çatısı
1287 | room (noun): a space inside a building with walls and a floor | loc: oda
  EN TS: An empty room? Time to dance!
  tr TS: Boş bir oda mı? Dans zamanı!
  EN FS: An empty shop? Time to dance!
  tr FS: Boş bir dükkân mı? Dans zamanı!
  EN TP: an empty sunny room
  tr TP: boş, güneşli bir oda
  EN FP: an empty sunny beach
  tr FP: boş, güneşli bir plaj
1290 | route (noun): the way you follow to get somewhere | loc: güzergâh
  EN TS: This route has so many bends!
  tr TS: Bu güzergâhta ne çok viraj var!
  EN FS: This route has so many trucks!
  tr FS: Bu güzergâhta ne çok kamyon var!
  EN TP: a route up the mountain
  tr TP: dağa çıkan bir güzergâh
  EN FP: a route along the coast
  tr FP: sahil boyunca bir güzergâh
1299 | scan (noun): a medical picture of the inside of your body | loc: tarama
  EN TS: He loves his scan, apparently.
  tr TS: Taramaya bayılıyor, belli ki.
  EN FS: He hates his scan, apparently.
  tr FS: Taramadan nefret ediyor, belli ki.
  EN TP: a patient having a scan
  tr TP: taramaya giren bir hasta
  EN FP: a scan at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında tarama
1303 | scooter (noun): a light motorbike with a small engine | loc: scooter
  EN TS: What a stylish scooter ride!
  tr TS: Ne şık bir scooter turu!
  EN FS: What a stylish bicycle ride!
  tr FS: Ne şık bir bisiklet turu!
  EN TP: a scooter in Italy
  tr TP: İtalya'da bir scooter
  EN FP: a scooter on the beach
  tr FP: plajda bir scooter
1304 | secretary (noun): a person who answers calls and does office work | loc: sekreter
  EN TS: The secretary is very busy!
  tr TS: Sekreter çok yoğun!
  EN FS: The secretary is very bored!
  tr FS: Sekreter çok sıkılmış!
  EN TP: a busy secretary
  tr TP: yoğun bir sekreter
  EN FP: a secretary on holiday
  tr FP: tatildeki bir sekreter
1305 | seed (noun): the small hard part that grows into a plant | loc: tohum
  EN TS: A bean seed is falling.
  tr TS: Bir fasulye tohumu düşüyor.
  EN FS: A small stone is falling.
  tr FS: Küçük bir taş düşüyor.
  EN TP: planting a bean seed
  tr TP: fasulye tohumu ekmek
  EN FP: a bird eating seeds
  tr FP: tohum yiyen bir kuş
1306 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: satıcı
  EN TS: The seller is very happy.
  tr TS: Satıcı çok mutlu.
  EN FS: The seller is very angry.
  tr FS: Satıcı çok kızgın.
  EN TP: a vegetable seller
  tr TP: bir sebze satıcısı
  EN FP: a book seller
  tr FP: bir kitap satıcısı
1307 | servant (noun): a person paid to work in someone's house | loc: hizmetçi
  EN TS: The servant has a silver tray.
  tr TS: Hizmetçinin gümüş bir tepsisi var.
  EN FS: The servant has a silver bell.
  tr FS: Hizmetçinin gümüş bir zili var.
  EN TP: a servant with a tray
  tr TP: tepsili bir hizmetçi
  EN FP: a servant in a kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir hizmetçi
1308 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: gölge
  EN TS: Even her shadow is dancing!
  tr TS: Gölgesi bile dans ediyor!
  EN FS: Even her friend is dancing!
  tr FS: Arkadaşı bile dans ediyor!
  EN TP: a giant wall shadow
  tr TP: duvarda dev bir gölge
  EN FP: a shadow under a tree
  tr FP: ağacın altında bir gölge
1311 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: gemi
  EN TS: She is waving at a huge ship!
  tr TS: Kocaman bir gemiye el sallıyor!
  EN FS: She is waving at a tiny ship!
  tr FS: Minicik bir gemiye el sallıyor!
  EN TP: waving at a big ship
  tr TP: büyük bir gemiye el sallamak
  EN FP: waving from a big ship
  tr FP: büyük bir gemiden el sallamak
1312 | shop assistant (noun): a person who helps customers in a store | loc: tezgâhtar
  EN TS: The shop assistant has a coat.
  tr TS: Tezgâhtarın bir paltosu var.
  EN FS: The shop assistant has a hat.
  tr FS: Tezgâhtarın bir şapkası var.
  EN TP: a shop assistant at work
  tr TP: iş başında bir tezgâhtar
  EN FP: a shop assistant on break
  tr FP: moladaki bir tezgâhtar
1314 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: omuz | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her shoulder needs a check.
  tr TS: Omzunun kontrol edilmesi gerekiyor.
  EN FS: Her knee needs a check.
  tr FS: Dizinin kontrol edilmesi gerekiyor.
  EN TP: examining a shoulder
  tr TP: omuz muayenesi
  EN FP: a bag on her shoulder
  tr FP: omzunda bir çanta
1315 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: duş
  EN TS: Rain shower? More like a waterfall!
  tr TS: Yağmur duşu mu? Resmen şelale!
  EN FS: Garden shower? More like a waterfall!
  tr FS: Bahçe duşu mu? Resmen şelale!
  EN TP: a big rain shower
  tr TP: büyük bir yağmur duşu
  EN FP: a shower curtain
  tr FP: bir duş perdesi
1316 | sibling (noun): your brother or your sister | loc: kardeş
  EN TS: The siblings are laughing.
  tr TS: Kardeşler gülüyor.
  EN FS: The siblings are arguing.
  tr FS: Kardeşler tartışıyor.
  EN TP: siblings laughing together
  tr TP: birlikte gülen kardeşler
  EN FP: siblings fighting over a toy
  tr FP: oyuncak kavgası yapan kardeşler
1317 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: kaldırım
  EN TS: He is on a stone sidewalk.
  tr TS: Taş bir kaldırımda duruyor.
  EN FS: He is on a wooden sidewalk.
  tr FS: Ahşap bir kaldırımda duruyor.
  EN TP: a wide stone sidewalk
  tr TP: geniş, taş bir kaldırım
  EN FP: a sidewalk full of people
  tr FP: insan dolu bir kaldırım
1319 | single (adjective): not married or in a relationship | loc: bekâr
  EN TS: She is single and happy.
  tr TS: O bekâr ve mutlu.
  EN FS: She is single and sad.
  tr FS: O bekâr ve mutsuz.
  EN TP: happy being single
  tr TP: bekâr ve mutlu
  EN FP: a single cup of tea
  tr FP: tek bir fincan çay
1321 | sir (noun): a polite word for talking to a man | loc: beyefendi
  EN TS: Here is your dish, sir.
  tr TS: Buyurun yemeğiniz, beyefendi.
  EN FS: Here is your bill, sir.
  tr FS: Buyurun hesabınız, beyefendi.
  EN TP: your dish, sir
  tr TP: yemeğiniz, beyefendi
  EN FP: your bill, sir
  tr FP: hesabınız, beyefendi
1323 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: gökdelen
  EN TS: What a tall skyscraper!
  tr TS: Ne kadar yüksek bir gökdelen!
  EN FS: What a tall lighthouse!
  tr FS: Ne kadar yüksek bir deniz feneri!
  EN TP: gazing up at a skyscraper
  tr TP: gökdelene yukarıdan bakmak
  EN FP: gazing down from a skyscraper
  tr FP: gökdelenden aşağı bakmak
1325 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: uyumak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping. The pillow is her friend.
  tr TS: Uyuyor. Yastık onun en iyi arkadaşı.
  EN FS: She is sleeping. The cat is her friend.
  tr FS: Uyuyor. Kedi onun en iyi arkadaşı.
  EN TP: sleeping on a bed
  tr TP: yatakta uyumak
  EN FP: sleeping on a train
  tr FP: trende uyumak
1326 | slippers (noun): soft warm shoes worn inside the house | loc: terlik
  EN TS: Fluffy slippers, lazy morning.
  tr TS: Pofuduk terlikler, tembel bir sabah.
  EN FS: Fluffy socks, lazy morning.
  tr FS: Pofuduk çoraplar, tembel bir sabah.
  EN TP: putting on fluffy slippers
  tr TP: pofuduk terlikleri giymek
  EN FP: fluffy slippers in a shop
  tr FP: mağazada pofuduk terlikler
1327 | slovak (adjective): from or belonging to the country east of Czechia | loc: Slovak
  EN TS: He wears Slovak folk clothes.
  tr TS: Adam Slovak halk kıyafeti giyiyor.
  EN FS: She wears Slovak folk clothes.
  tr FS: Kadın Slovak halk kıyafeti giyiyor.
  EN TP: Slovak folk dress
  tr TP: Slovak halk kıyafeti
  EN FP: a Slovak football shirt
  tr FP: bir Slovak futbol forması
1328 | slovakia (noun): a small central European country next to Austria | loc: Slovakya
  EN TS: She is dancing in Slovakia!
  tr TS: Slovakya'da dans ediyor!
  EN FS: She is swimming in Slovakia!
  tr FS: Slovakya'da yüzüyor!
  EN TP: a meadow in Slovakia
  tr TP: Slovakya'da bir çayır
  EN FP: a beach in Slovakia
  tr FP: Slovakya'da bir plaj
1337 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: kanepe
  EN TS: They are playing on the sofa.
  tr TS: Kanepede oynuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are playing on the floor.
  tr FS: Yerde oynuyorlar.
  EN TP: friends on a grey sofa
  tr TP: gri bir kanepede arkadaşlar
  EN FP: friends on a grey bus
  tr FP: gri bir otobüste arkadaşlar
1340 | somebody (noun): a person, when you don't say who | loc: biri
  EN TS: Somebody is leaving in secret.
  tr TS: Biri gizlice gidiyor.
  EN FS: Somebody is dancing in secret.
  tr FS: Biri gizlice dans ediyor.
  EN TP: somebody walking away
  tr TP: uzaklaşan biri
  EN FP: somebody walking a dog
  tr FP: köpek gezdiren biri
1342 | son (noun): a male child of his parents | loc: oğul | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: His son is back home!
  tr TS: Oğlu eve döndü!
  EN FS: His daughter is back home!
  tr FS: Kızı eve döndü!
  EN TP: hugging his adult son
  tr TP: yetişkin oğluna sarılmak
  EN FP: waving goodbye to his son
  tr FP: oğluna el sallayıp vedalaşmak
1344 | spider (noun): a small creature with eight legs that makes webs | loc: örümcek
  EN TS: The spider is at work.
  tr TS: Örümcek iş başında.
  EN FS: The ant is at work.
  tr FS: Karınca iş başında.
  EN TP: a spider in its web
  tr TP: ağındaki bir örümcek
  EN FP: a spider in the bath
  tr FP: küvette bir örümcek
1346 | spit (verb): to force water or saliva out of your mouth | loc: tükürmek
  EN TS: The boxer is spitting water.
  tr TS: Boksör su tükürüyor.
  EN FS: The boxer is drinking water.
  tr FS: Boksör su içiyor.
  EN TP: spitting water into a bucket
  tr TP: kovaya su tükürmek
  EN FP: spitting out chewing gum
  tr FP: sakız tükürmek
1347 | sponge (noun): a soft object with holes used for washing | loc: sünger
  EN TS: A hand is squeezing a sponge.
  tr TS: Bir el süngeri sıkıyor.
  EN FS: A hand is squeezing a lemon.
  tr FS: Bir el limonu sıkıyor.
  EN TP: a squeezed soapy sponge
  tr TP: sıkılan köpüklü bir sünger
  EN FP: a sponge cake
  tr FP: bir dilim pandispanya
1350 | square (noun): an open space in a town with buildings around it | loc: meydan
  EN TS: She is crossing the square. Bye, pigeons!
  tr TS: Meydandan geçiyor. Hoşça kalın, güvercinler!
  EN FS: She is crossing the river. Bye, pigeons!
  tr FS: Nehirden geçiyor. Hoşça kalın, güvercinler!
  EN TP: running across a square
  tr TP: meydanda koşmak
  EN FP: sitting in a quiet square
  tr FP: sessiz bir meydanda oturmak
1353 | star (noun): a body of hot gases that shines in the sky | loc: yıldız
  EN TS: One bright star. Make a wish!
  tr TS: Tek bir parlak yıldız. Dilek tut!
  EN FS: One bright moon. Make a wish!
  tr FS: Tek bir parlak ay. Dilek tut!
  EN TP: pointing at a bright star
  tr TP: parlak bir yıldızı göstermek
  EN FP: a star on a tree
  tr FP: ağaçta bir yıldız
1354 | station (noun): a place with special equipment for one purpose | loc: istasyon | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Late again at the station!
  tr TS: İstasyonda yine geç kaldık!
  EN FS: Late again at the airport!
  tr FS: Havalimanında yine geç kaldık!
  EN TP: hurrying through a station
  tr TP: istasyonda koşturmak
  EN FP: sleeping at the station
  tr FP: istasyonda uyumak
1355 | steering wheel (noun): the round thing you turn to drive a car | loc: direksiyon
  EN TS: Hands on the steering wheel.
  tr TS: Eller direksiyonda.
  EN FS: Hands on the phone.
  tr FS: Eller telefonda.
  EN TP: hands on the steering wheel
  tr TP: direksiyonda eller
  EN FP: a boat's steering wheel
  tr FP: bir teknenin dümeni
1358 | stepmother (noun): the woman married to your father, not your mum | loc: üvey anne
  EN TS: Her stepmother is braiding her hair.
  tr TS: Üvey annesi saçını örüyor.
  EN FS: Her stepmother is cutting her hair.
  tr FS: Üvey annesi saçını kesiyor.
  EN TP: a stepmother braiding hair
  tr TP: saç ören bir üvey anne
  EN FP: a stepmother at school
  tr FP: okulda bir üvey anne
1359 | stepsister (noun): the daughter of your parent's new partner | loc: üvey kız kardeş
  EN TS: The stepsisters can't stop laughing.
  tr TS: Üvey kız kardeşler gülmekten kendilerini alamıyor.
  EN FS: The stepsisters can't stop crying.
  tr FS: Üvey kız kardeşler ağlamaktan kendilerini alamıyor.
  EN TP: stepsisters laughing together
  tr TP: birlikte gülen üvey kız kardeşler
  EN FP: stepsisters sharing a bed
  tr FP: yatak paylaşan üvey kız kardeşler
1360 | stethoscope (noun): the tool a doctor uses to listen to your heart | loc: stetoskop
  EN TS: She is using a stethoscope. Shh!
  tr TS: Stetoskop kullanıyor. Şşş!
  EN FS: She is using a thermometer. Shh!
  tr FS: Termometre kullanıyor. Şşş!
  EN TP: listening with a stethoscope
  tr TP: stetoskopla dinlemek
  EN FP: a stethoscope on a table
  tr FP: masada bir stetoskop
1362 | stitch (noun): a small loop of thread that closes a wound | loc: dikiş
  EN TS: The cut is getting stitches.
  tr TS: Kesiğe dikiş atılıyor.
  EN FS: The cut is getting a plaster.
  tr FS: Kesiğe yara bandı yapıştırılıyor.
  EN TP: stitches in a forearm
  tr TP: ön kolda dikişler
  EN FP: stitches in a shirt
  tr FP: gömlekte dikişler
1363 | stone (noun): a lump or mass of hard rock | loc: taş
  EN TS: This stone will swim, right?
  tr TS: Bu taş yüzer, değil mi?
  EN FS: This leaf will swim, right?
  tr FS: Bu yaprak yüzer, değil mi?
  EN TP: a stone over a lake
  tr TP: gölün üstünde bir taş
  EN FP: a stone in a wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir taş
1365 | stranger (noun): a person you do not know at all | loc: yabancı
  EN TS: A stranger is stopping her.
  tr TS: Bir yabancı onu durduruyor.
  EN FS: A policeman is stopping her.
  tr FS: Bir polis onu durduruyor.
  EN TP: a stranger in a hood
  tr TP: kapüşonlu bir yabancı
  EN FP: a stranger with a dog
  tr FP: köpekli bir yabancı
1366 | stream (noun): a small narrow river running through land | loc: dere
  EN TS: A leaf is surfing the stream.
  tr TS: Bir yaprak derede sörf yapıyor.
  EN FS: A frog is surfing the stream.
  tr FS: Bir kurbağa derede sörf yapıyor.
  EN TP: a clear forest stream
  tr TP: berrak bir orman deresi
  EN FP: a stream full of fish
  tr FP: balık dolu bir dere
1367 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: sokak
  EN TS: She is crossing a busy street.
  tr TS: Kalabalık bir sokaktan karşıya geçiyor.
  EN FS: She is crossing a busy bridge.
  tr FS: Kalabalık bir köprüden karşıya geçiyor.
  EN TP: a busy big-city street
  tr TP: büyük şehirde kalabalık sokak
  EN FP: a quiet village street
  tr FP: sessiz bir köy sokağı
1369 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: sokak lambası
  EN TS: Rain? He is dancing with a streetlight!
  tr TS: Yağmur mu? Sokak lambasıyla dans ediyor!
  EN FS: Rain? He is dancing with a traffic light!
  tr FS: Yağmur mu? Trafik ışığıyla dans ediyor!
  EN TP: a row of lit streetlights
  tr TP: sıra sıra yanan sokak lambaları
  EN FP: a row of lit candles
  tr FP: sıra sıra yanan mumlar
1371 | subway (noun): an underground train in a city | loc: metro
  EN TS: The subway train is super fast.
  tr TS: Metro treni aşırı hızlı.
  EN FS: The subway train is super slow.
  tr FS: Metro treni aşırı yavaş.
  EN TP: a subway train rushing past
  tr TP: hızla geçen bir metro treni
  EN FP: a subway map
  tr FP: bir metro haritası
1372 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: valiz
  EN TS: Her suitcase is grey and practical.
  tr TS: Valizi gri ve pratik.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is red and practical.
  tr FS: Valizi kırmızı ve pratik.
  EN TP: pulling a grey suitcase
  tr TP: gri bir valiz çekmek
  EN FP: packing a grey suitcase
  tr FP: gri bir valiz hazırlamak
1373 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: yaz
  EN TS: Summer vibes: big lake jump.
  tr TS: Yaz modu: göle koca bir atlayış.
  EN FS: Summer vibes: big pool jump.
  tr FS: Yaz modu: havuza koca bir atlayış.
  EN TP: a summer lake jump
  tr TP: yazın göle atlamak
  EN FP: a summer pool party
  tr FP: bir yaz havuz partisi
1375 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: ter
  EN TS: Sweat is flying off her glove!
  tr TS: Eldiveninden ter saçılıyor!
  EN FS: Sweat is flying off her shoe!
  tr FS: Ayakkabısından ter saçılıyor!
  EN TP: sweat on her arm
  tr TP: kolunda ter
  EN FP: sweat on a shirt
  tr FP: bir gömlekte ter
1378 | swiss (adjective): from or made in Switzerland | loc: İsviçre
  EN TS: She is having a Swiss fondue.
  tr TS: İsviçre fondüsü yiyor.
  EN FS: She is having Swiss chocolate.
  tr FS: İsviçre çikolatası yiyor.
  EN TP: a Swiss cheese fondue
  tr TP: İsviçre peynir fondüsü
  EN FP: a Swiss chocolate fondue
  tr FP: İsviçre çikolata fondüsü
1379 | switch (noun): a device that turns the electricity on or off | loc: ışık düğmesi
  EN TS: Someone found the switch. Wow.
  tr TS: Biri ışık düğmesini buldu. Vay be.
  EN FS: Someone found the phone. Wow.
  tr FS: Biri telefonu buldu. Vay be.
  EN TP: a light switch
  tr TP: bir ışık düğmesi
  EN FP: a railway switch
  tr FP: bir demiryolu makası
1380 | switzerland (noun): a small country in Europe known for the Alps | loc: İsviçre
  EN TS: Switzerland: even the cows get music.
  tr TS: İsviçre: inekler bile müzik dinliyor.
  EN FS: Switzerland: even the goats get music.
  tr FS: İsviçre: keçiler bile müzik dinliyor.
  EN TP: an alphorn in Switzerland
  tr TP: İsviçre'de bir alp borusu
  EN FP: a cowbell shop in Switzerland
  tr FP: İsviçre'de inek çanı dükkânı
1381 | syringe (noun): a tube with a needle used to inject medicine | loc: şırınga
  EN TS: The syringe is squirting!
  tr TS: Şırınga fışkırtıyor!
  EN FS: The bottle is squirting!
  tr FS: Şişe fışkırtıyor!
  EN TP: squirting a syringe
  tr TP: şırıngadan fışkırtmak
  EN FP: filling a syringe
  tr FP: şırınga doldurmak
1383 | tailor (noun): a person who makes and fits clothes | loc: terzi
  EN TS: The tailor is fixing a jacket.
  tr TS: Terzi bir ceketi düzeltiyor.
  EN FS: The tailor is fixing a shoe.
  tr FS: Terzi bir ayakkabıyı düzeltiyor.
  EN TP: a tailor with a tape
  tr TP: mezuralı bir terzi
  EN FP: a tailor selling shoes
  tr FP: ayakkabı satan bir terzi
1385 | tap (noun): a thing you turn to let water run out | loc: musluk
  EN TS: Water from a tap! Wow!
  tr TS: Musluktan su! Vay!
  EN FS: Water from a hose! Wow!
  tr FS: Hortumdan su! Vay!
  EN TP: turning the tap
  tr TP: musluğu açmak
  EN FP: a tap on the shoulder
  tr FP: omza hafifçe vurmak
1386 | taxi driver (noun): a person paid to take people places by car | loc: taksi şoförü
  EN TS: The taxi driver is waving!
  tr TS: Taksi şoförü el sallıyor!
  EN FS: The taxi driver is sleeping!
  tr FS: Taksi şoförü uyuyor!
  EN TP: a waving taxi driver
  tr TP: el sallayan bir taksi şoförü
  EN FP: a taxi driver at night
  tr FP: gece bir taksi şoförü
1389 | tear (noun): a drop of water that falls from your eye | loc: gözyaşı
  EN TS: Her tears are falling.
  tr TS: Kadının gözyaşları akıyor.
  EN FS: His tears are falling.
  tr FS: Adamın gözyaşları akıyor.
  EN TP: a tear on her cheek
  tr TP: yanağında bir gözyaşı
  EN FP: a tear in her dress
  tr FP: elbisesinde bir yırtık
1390 | moon (noun): the big round light in the sky at night | loc: ay
  EN TS: He wants to touch the moon.
  tr TS: Ay'a dokunmak istiyor.
  EN FS: He wants to touch the sun.
  tr FS: Güneşe dokunmak istiyor.
  EN TP: reaching for the moon
  tr TP: aya uzanmak
  EN FP: a moon over the sea
  tr FP: denizin üstünde ay
1394 | sun (noun): the light and rays of the sun | loc: güneş
  EN TS: A big orange sun on the sea.
  tr TS: Denizin üstünde kocaman turuncu bir güneş.
  EN FS: A big orange sun on the snow.
  tr FS: Karın üstünde kocaman turuncu bir güneş.
  EN TP: the sun over the sea
  tr TP: denizin üstünde güneş
  EN FP: the sun over mountains
  tr FP: dağların üstünde güneş
1396 | theater (noun): a building where people watch plays | loc: tiyatro
  EN TS: The whole theater is hers!
  tr TS: Koca tiyatro bu kıza kaldı!
  EN FS: The whole theater is his!
  tr FS: Koca tiyatro bu adama kaldı!
  EN TP: an empty old theater
  tr TP: boş, eski bir tiyatro
  EN FP: a theater full of people
  tr FP: insan dolu bir tiyatro
1398 | thermometer (noun): an instrument that measures temperature | loc: termometre
  EN TS: Her thermometer is huge!
  tr TS: Termometresi kocaman!
  EN FS: Her toothbrush is huge!
  tr FS: Diş fırçası kocaman!
  EN TP: a big glass thermometer
  tr TP: büyük, cam bir termometre
  EN FP: a thermometer on the wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir termometre
1400 | throat (noun): the passage to your stomach and lungs | loc: boğaz
  EN TS: Her throat is getting a check.
  tr TS: Boğazı kontrol ediliyor.
  EN FS: Her ear is getting a check.
  tr FS: Kulağı kontrol ediliyor.
  EN TP: a light in the throat
  tr TP: boğaza tutulan ışık
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  tr FP: boğazını temizlemek
1403 | toe (noun): one of the five small end parts of the foot | loc: ayak parmağı
  EN TS: These toes love the beach!
  tr TS: Bu ayak parmakları kumsala bayılıyor!
  EN FS: These toes love the snow!
  tr FS: Bu ayak parmakları kara bayılıyor!
  EN TP: toes in wet sand
  tr TP: ıslak kumda ayak parmakları
  EN FP: toes in soft grass
  tr FP: yumuşak çimde ayak parmakları
1404 | tongue (noun): the soft muscular part inside your mouth | loc: dil
  EN TS: Her tongue is catching snow for lunch.
  tr TS: Dili öğle yemeği için kar yakalıyor.
  EN FS: Her hand is catching snow for lunch.
  tr FS: Eli öğle yemeği için kar yakalıyor.
  EN TP: sticking out her tongue
  tr TP: dilini çıkarmak
  EN FP: biting her tongue
  tr FP: dilini ısırmak
1405 | tooth (noun): one of the hard white parts in your jaws | loc: diş
  EN TS: Every single tooth is being checked.
  tr TS: Her bir diş tek tek kontrol ediliyor.
  EN FS: Every single nail is being checked.
  tr FS: Her bir tırnak tek tek kontrol ediliyor.
  EN TP: checking a tooth
  tr TP: bir dişi kontrol etmek
  EN FP: a tooth fairy
  tr FP: diş perisi
1406 | toothbrush (noun): a small brush used for cleaning the teeth | loc: diş fırçası
  EN TS: Look at my toothbrush!
  tr TS: Şu diş fırçama bak!
  EN FS: Look at my hairbrush!
  tr FS: Şu saç fırçama bak!
  EN TP: a toothbrush with foam
  tr TP: köpüklü bir diş fırçası
  EN FP: a toothbrush in a cup
  tr FP: bardakta bir diş fırçası
1410 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: trafik ışığı
  EN TS: She is at a traffic light.
  tr TS: Trafik ışığında bekliyor.
  EN FS: She is at a bus stop.
  tr FS: Otobüs durağında bekliyor.
  EN TP: waiting at a traffic light
  tr TP: trafik ışığında beklemek
  EN FP: waiting at a train station
  tr FP: tren istasyonunda beklemek
1411 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: tramvay
  EN TS: Old tram, big smile, great style.
  tr TS: Eski tramvay, kocaman gülüş, harika tarz.
  EN FS: Old bus, big smile, great style.
  tr FS: Eski otobüs, kocaman gülüş, harika tarz.
  EN TP: an old green tram
  tr TP: eski, yeşil bir tramvay
  EN FP: an old green bus
  tr FP: eski, yeşil bir otobüs
1413 | treadmill (noun): a gym machine with a moving belt to run on | loc: koşu bandı
  EN TS: Treadmill: running to nowhere.
  tr TS: Koşu bandı: hiçbir yere koşmak.
  EN FS: Treadmill: walking to nowhere.
  tr FS: Koşu bandı: hiçbir yere yürümek.
  EN TP: running on a treadmill
  tr TP: koşu bandında koşmak
  EN FP: fixing a broken treadmill
  tr FP: bozuk koşu bandını tamir etmek
1414 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: kocaman
  EN TS: Wow, the oak is enormous!
  tr TS: Vay, meşe kocaman!
  EN FS: Wow, the palm is enormous!
  tr FS: Vay, palmiye kocaman!
  EN TP: an enormous oak tree
  tr TP: kocaman bir meşe ağacı
  EN FP: an enormous picnic basket
  tr FP: kocaman bir piknik sepeti
1415 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: kamyon
  EN TS: He is climbing into his truck.
  tr TS: Kamyonuna biniyor.
  EN FS: He is climbing into his car.
  tr FS: Arabasına biniyor.
  EN TP: a big silver truck
  tr TP: büyük, gümüş bir kamyon
  EN FP: a big silver bus
  tr FP: büyük, gümüş bir otobüs
1416 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: tünel
  EN TS: He is riding out of a tunnel.
  tr TS: Motoruyla tünelden çıkıyor.
  EN FS: He is riding out of a garage.
  tr FS: Motoruyla garajdan çıkıyor.
  EN TP: out of a road tunnel
  tr TP: karayolu tünelinden çıkış
  EN FP: into a train tunnel
  tr FP: tren tüneline giriş
1419 | twin (noun): one of two children born at the same time | loc: ikiz | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Twins, same dress. Planned?
  tr TS: İkizler, aynı elbise. Planlı mı?
  EN FS: Twins, same hat. Planned?
  tr FS: İkizler, aynı şapka. Planlı mı?
  EN TP: twins in matching dresses
  tr TP: aynı elbiseli ikizler
  EN FP: twins in a pram
  tr FP: bebek arabasında ikizler
1420 | uncle (noun): the brother of your father or mother | loc: amca
  EN TS: Best uncle ever!
  tr TS: Dünyanın en iyi amcası!
  EN FS: Best aunt ever!
  tr FS: Dünyanın en iyi teyzesi!
  EN TP: on his uncle's shoulders
  tr TP: amcasının omuzlarında
  EN FP: on his uncle's bike
  tr FP: amcasının bisikletinde
1422 | to point (verb): to show where something is with your finger | loc: göstermek
  EN TS: A hand is pointing at the screen.
  tr TS: Bir el ekranı gösteriyor.
  EN FS: A hand is pointing at the window.
  tr FS: Bir el pencereyi gösteriyor.
  EN TP: to point at a screen
  tr TP: ekranı göstermek
  EN FP: to point at the door
  tr FP: kapıyı göstermek
1423 | chart (noun): a drawing that shows data as bars or lines | loc: grafik
  EN TS: Pointing at a bar chart.
  tr TS: Bir sütun grafiğini gösteriyor.
  EN FS: Pointing at a pie chart.
  tr FS: Bir pasta grafiğini gösteriyor.
  EN TP: bar and line charts
  tr TP: sütun ve çizgi grafikleri
  EN FP: a chart on paper
  tr FP: kâğıtta bir grafik
1424 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: iş arkadaşı
  EN TS: The standing colleague wears blue.
  tr TS: Ayaktaki iş arkadaşı mavi giymiş.
  EN FS: The standing colleague wears red.
  tr FS: Ayaktaki iş arkadaşı kırmızı giymiş.
  EN TP: colleague in a blue shirt
  tr TP: mavi gömlekli iş arkadaşı
  EN FP: colleague in a red shirt
  tr FP: kırmızı gömlekli iş arkadaşı
1425 | leash (noun): a strap you hold to control a dog | loc: tasma
  EN TS: Guess who is on a leash.
  tr TS: Bil bakalım kim tasmalı.
  EN FS: Guess who is on a sofa.
  tr FS: Bil bakalım kim kanepede.
  EN TP: a dog on a leash
  tr TP: tasmalı bir köpek
  EN FP: a dog off the leash
  tr FP: tasmasız bir köpek
1427 | to balance (verb): to keep your body steady so you don't fall | loc: dengede durmak
  EN TS: He is balancing on a rope!
  tr TS: İpin üstünde dengede duruyor!
  EN FS: He is balancing on a log!
  tr FS: Kütüğün üstünde dengede duruyor!
  EN TP: balancing on a thin rope
  tr TP: ince bir ipte dengede durmak
  EN FP: balancing on a thin branch
  tr FP: ince bir dalda dengede durmak
1429 | to sing (verb): to make music with your voice | loc: şarkı söylemek
  EN TS: He is singing for his friends.
  tr TS: Arkadaşları için şarkı söylüyor.
  EN FS: He is dancing for his friends.
  tr FS: Arkadaşları için dans ediyor.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  tr TP: mikrofona şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  tr FP: duşta şarkı söylemek
1432 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: kostüm
  EN TS: He is singing in a costume. The glass slipper is ready.
  tr TS: Kostümle şarkı söylüyor. Cam ayakkabı hazır.
  EN FS: He is dancing in a costume. The glass slipper is ready.
  tr FS: Kostümle dans ediyor. Cam ayakkabı hazır.
  EN TP: singing in a costume
  tr TP: kostümle şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: shopping for a costume
  tr FP: kostüm alışverişi
1433 | to dance (verb): to move your body to music | loc: dans etmek
  EN TS: It's just a normal dance at home.
  tr TS: Evde normal normal dans ediyorlar, o kadar.
  EN FS: It's just a normal dinner at home.
  tr FS: Evde normal normal yemek yiyorlar, o kadar.
  EN TP: dancing in costumes
  tr TP: kostümlerle dans etmek
  EN FP: dancing on a stage
  tr FP: sahnede dans etmek
1434 | thief (noun): a person who steals things | loc: hırsız
  EN TS: Nobody sees the thief on the chandelier.
  tr TS: Avizedeki hırsızı kimse görmüyor.
  EN FS: Nobody sees the thief on the roof.
  tr FS: Çatıdaki hırsızı kimse görmüyor.
  EN TP: a thief with a bag
  tr TP: çantalı bir hırsız
  EN FP: a thief with a gun
  tr FP: silahlı bir hırsız
1435 | microphone (noun): a device you speak into to make your voice louder | loc: mikrofon
  EN TS: He won't share the microphone.
  tr TS: Mikrofonu kimseyle paylaşmıyor.
  EN FS: He won't share the guitar.
  tr FS: Gitarı kimseyle paylaşmıyor.
  EN TP: a microphone on a stand
  tr TP: ayaklı bir mikrofon
  EN FP: a microphone in a phone
  tr FP: telefondaki mikrofon
1436 | diverse (adjective): of many different kinds | loc: çeşitli
  EN TS: The people are diverse in age.
  tr TS: İnsanlar çeşitli yaşlarda.
  EN FS: The people are all teenagers.
  tr FS: İnsanların hepsi ergen.
  EN TP: five diverse portraits
  tr TP: beş çeşitli portre
  EN FP: five diverse landscapes
  tr FP: beş çeşitli manzara
1438 | podcast (noun): a talk show you record and stream online | loc: podcast
  EN TS: He is recording a podcast.
  tr TS: Adam bir podcast kaydediyor.
  EN FS: She is recording a podcast.
  tr FS: Kadın bir podcast kaydediyor.
  EN TP: recording a podcast
  tr TP: podcast kaydetmek
  EN FP: listening to a podcast
  tr FP: podcast dinlemek
1441 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: çaba
  EN TS: Her win was worth the effort.
  tr TS: Kazandığı zafer çabaya değdi.
  EN FS: Her win was worth the money.
  tr FS: Kazandığı zafer paraya değdi.
  EN TP: worth the effort
  tr TP: çabaya değer
  EN FP: an effort to stay awake
  tr FP: uyanık kalma çabası
1442 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: ofis
  EN TS: This office is full of plants.
  tr TS: Bu ofis bitki dolu.
  EN FS: This office is full of dogs.
  tr FS: Bu ofis köpek dolu.
  EN TP: a bright open office
  tr TP: aydınlık, açık bir ofis
  EN FP: a dark empty office
  tr FP: karanlık, boş bir ofis
1446 | conference (noun): a big event where people meet to hear talks | loc: konferans
  EN TS: The conference is packed!
  tr TS: Konferans tıklım tıklım!
  EN FS: The conference is empty!
  tr FS: Konferans bomboş!
  EN TP: a crowded conference hall
  tr TP: kalabalık bir konferans salonu
  EN FP: a video conference call
  tr FP: görüntülü konferans görüşmesi
1447 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: aşı
  EN TS: The vaccine hurts a bit.
  tr TS: Aşı biraz acıtıyor.
  EN FS: The vaccine tickles a bit.
  tr FS: Aşı biraz gıdıklıyor.
  EN TP: a vaccine in the arm
  tr TP: koldan aşı
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  tr FP: bacaktan aşı
1450 | visitor (noun): someone who comes to visit you | loc: ziyaretçi
  EN TS: Flowers from a visitor. Sweet.
  tr TS: Bir ziyaretçiden çiçekler. Ne tatlı.
  EN FS: Candy from a visitor. Sweet.
  tr FS: Bir ziyaretçiden şekerler. Ne tatlı.
  EN TP: a visitor with flowers
  tr TP: çiçekli bir ziyaretçi
  EN FP: a visitor at the museum
  tr FP: müzede bir ziyaretçi
1451 | vitamin (noun): a substance in food that keeps you healthy | loc: vitamin
  EN TS: This vitamin makes her laugh.
  tr TS: Bu vitamin onu güldürüyor.
  EN FS: This vitamin makes her cry.
  tr FS: Bu vitamin onu ağlatıyor.
  EN TP: an orange gummy vitamin
  tr TP: turuncu jelibon vitamin
  EN FP: a green gummy vitamin
  tr FP: yeşil jelibon vitamin
1452 | volcano (noun): a mountain that erupts fire and melted rock | loc: yanardağ
  EN TS: The volcano is a bit angry.
  tr TS: Yanardağ biraz sinirli.
  EN FS: The volcano is a bit sleepy.
  tr FS: Yanardağ biraz uykulu.
  EN TP: a volcano erupting at night
  tr TP: gece patlayan bir yanardağ
  EN FP: a volcano covered in snow
  tr FP: karla kaplı bir yanardağ
1453 | voyage (noun): a long journey across the sea by ship | loc: deniz yolculuğu
  EN TS: The ship is on a long voyage.
  tr TS: Gemi uzun bir deniz yolculuğunda.
  EN FS: The ship is on a river voyage.
  tr FS: Gemi bir nehir yolculuğunda.
  EN TP: a voyage across the ocean
  tr TP: okyanusu aşan deniz yolculuğu
  EN FP: a voyage along the river
  tr FP: nehir boyunca bir yolculuk
1454 | waist (noun): the narrow middle of the body above the hips | loc: bel
  EN TS: She is measuring her waist.
  tr TS: Belini ölçüyor.
  EN FS: She is measuring her arm.
  tr FS: Kolunu ölçüyor.
  EN TP: a tape around the waist
  tr TP: bele sarılı bir mezura
  EN FP: a belt around the waist
  tr FP: bele takılı bir kemer
1457 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: kadın garson
  EN TS: The waitress is serving a milkshake.
  tr TS: Kadın garson milkshake servis ediyor.
  EN FS: The waitress is serving a pizza.
  tr FS: Kadın garson pizza servis ediyor.
  EN TP: a waitress serving breakfast
  tr TP: kahvaltı servis eden kadın garson
  EN FP: a waitress eating breakfast
  tr FP: kahvaltı yapan kadın garson
1458 | walker (noun): someone who walks for exercise or pleasure | loc: yürüyüşçü
  EN TS: The walker has a golden dog.
  tr TS: Yürüyüşçünün altın sarısı bir köpeği var.
  EN FS: The walker has a black dog.
  tr FS: Yürüyüşçünün siyah bir köpeği var.
  EN TP: a walker with trekking poles
  tr TP: batonlu bir yürüyüşçü
  EN FP: a walker with a buggy
  tr FP: bebek arabalı bir yürüyüşçü
1459 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: duvar
  EN TS: He is painting the wall white.
  tr TS: Duvarı beyaza boyuyor.
  EN FS: He is painting the wall blue.
  tr FS: Duvarı maviye boyuyor.
  EN TP: a big bare wall
  tr TP: büyük, çıplak bir duvar
  EN FP: a wall around a garden
  tr FP: bahçeyi çevreleyen bir duvar
1466 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: hava
  EN TS: Rain or sun? The weather can't decide.
  tr TS: Yağmur mu, güneş mi? Hava karar veremiyor.
  EN FS: Snow or sun? The weather can't decide.
  tr FS: Kar mı, güneş mi? Hava karar veremiyor.
  EN TP: changing weather on a hill
  tr TP: tepede değişken hava
  EN FP: sunny weather on a beach
  tr FP: plajda güneşli hava
1467 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: tekerlek
  EN TS: A mechanic is rolling a wheel.
  tr TS: Bir tamirci tekerlek yuvarlıyor.
  EN FS: A mechanic is washing a wheel.
  tr FS: Bir tamirci tekerlek yıkıyor.
  EN TP: rolling a car wheel
  tr TP: araba tekerleği yuvarlamak
  EN FP: a wheel on a bicycle
  tr FP: bisikletteki bir tekerlek
1468 | wheelchair (noun): a chair on wheels for someone who cannot walk | loc: tekerlekli sandalye
  EN TS: Full speed in a racing wheelchair!
  tr TS: Yarış tekerlekli sandalyesiyle son hız!
  EN FS: Full speed in a racing go-kart!
  tr FS: Yarış go-kartıyla son hız!
  EN TP: a racing wheelchair
  tr TP: yarış tekerlekli sandalyesi
  EN FP: a wheelchair ramp
  tr FP: tekerlekli sandalye rampası
1473 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: işçi | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The worker is holding a beam.
  tr TS: İşçi bir kiriş tutuyor.
  EN FS: The worker is holding a pipe.
  tr FS: İşçi bir boru tutuyor.
  EN TP: a worker in goggles
  tr TP: koruyucu gözlüklü bir işçi
  EN FP: a worker in a suit
  tr FP: takım elbiseli bir işçi
1476 | writer (noun): a person who creates books or stories as a job | loc: yazar
  EN TS: The writer is typing at night, of course.
  tr TS: Yazar gece yazıyor, tabii ki.
  EN FS: The writer is typing at noon, of course.
  tr FS: Yazar öğlen yazıyor, tabii ki.
  EN TP: a writer at a typewriter
  tr TP: daktilo başında bir yazar
  EN FP: a writer at a laptop
  tr FP: laptop başında bir yazar
1477 | x ray (noun): a photo of the inside of the body showing bones | loc: röntgen
  EN TS: The X-ray shows hand bones.
  tr TS: Röntgende el kemikleri görünüyor.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows foot bones.
  tr FS: Röntgende ayak kemikleri görünüyor.
  EN TP: an X-ray of a hand
  tr TP: bir elin röntgeni
  EN FP: an X-ray of a foot
  tr FP: bir ayağın röntgeni
1479 | zoo (noun): a place where wild animals are kept to see | loc: hayvanat bahçesi
  EN TS: Lunch service at the zoo.
  tr TS: Hayvanat bahçesinde öğle yemeği servisi.
  EN FS: Lunch service at the farm.
  tr FS: Çiftlikte öğle yemeği servisi.
  EN TP: a giraffe at the zoo
  tr TP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir zürafa
  EN FP: a lion at the zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir aslan
1481 | archway (noun): a curved opening in a wall that you walk through | loc: kemerli geçit
  EN TS: The castle has two archways.
  tr TS: Şatonun iki kemerli geçidi var.
  EN FS: The castle has four archways.
  tr FS: Şatonun dört kemerli geçidi var.
  EN TP: an archway under the steps
  tr TP: merdiven altında kemerli geçit
  EN FP: an archway over the river
  tr FP: nehrin üstünde kemerli geçit
1482 | earrings (noun): pieces of jewellery you wear on your ears | loc: küpeler
  EN TS: Great gold earrings!
  tr TS: Harika altın küpeler!
  EN FS: Great silver earrings!
  tr FS: Harika gümüş küpeler!
  EN TP: big gold hoop earrings
  tr TP: büyük altın halka küpeler
  EN FP: earrings in a gift box
  tr FP: hediye kutusunda küpeler
1483 | strawberry (noun): a soft red fruit with tiny seeds on it | loc: çilek
  EN TS: The strawberries are red.
  tr TS: Çilekler kırmızı.
  EN FS: The strawberries are green.
  tr FS: Çilekler yeşil.
  EN TP: a strawberry plant
  tr TP: bir çilek fidesi
  EN FP: a strawberry milkshake
  tr FP: çilekli bir milkshake
1484 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: müzik
  EN TS: This music has no play button.
  tr TS: Bu müziğin oynat tuşu yok.
  EN FS: This poem has no play button.
  tr FS: Bu şiirin oynat tuşu yok.
  EN TP: old sheet music
  tr TP: eski müzik notaları
  EN FP: an old music box
  tr FP: eski bir müzik kutusu
1485 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: satmak
  EN TS: They want to sell the house.
  tr TS: Evi satmak istiyorlar.
  EN FS: They want to sell the car.
  tr FS: Arabayı satmak istiyorlar.
  EN TP: selling a white house
  tr TP: beyaz bir ev satmak
  EN FP: selling a red car
  tr FP: kırmızı bir araba satmak
1487 | god (noun): a divine being that people worship | loc: tanrı
  EN TS: The god has a golden throne.
  tr TS: Tanrının altın bir tahtı var.
  EN FS: The god has a silver throne.
  tr FS: Tanrının gümüş bir tahtı var.
  EN TP: a god on a throne
  tr TP: tahtında bir tanrı
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir kral
1488 | carriage (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by horses | loc: at arabası
  EN TS: Horses are pulling a carriage.
  tr TS: At arabasını atlar çekiyor.
  EN FS: Oxen are pulling a carriage.
  tr FS: At arabasını öküzler çekiyor.
  EN TP: a golden royal carriage
  tr TP: yaldızlı bir kraliyet at arabası
  EN FP: a golden train carriage
  tr FP: yaldızlı bir tren vagonu
1489 | fairy (noun): a small magic person with wings from stories | loc: peri
  EN TS: The fairy's best friend is a frog.
  tr TS: Perinin en iyi arkadaşı bir kurbağa.
  EN FS: The fairy's best friend is a cat.
  tr FS: Perinin en iyi arkadaşı bir kedi.
  EN TP: a fairy on the moss
  tr TP: yosunların üstünde bir peri
  EN FP: a fairy in the sky
  tr FP: gökyüzünde bir peri
1491 | butterfly (noun): an insect with large colorful wings | loc: kelebek
  EN TS: So many butterflies!
  tr TS: Ne çok kelebek!
  EN FS: So many birds!
  tr FS: Ne çok kuş!
  EN TP: butterflies above the flowers
  tr TP: çiçeklerin üstünde kelebekler
  EN FP: butterflies on a shirt
  tr FP: gömlekteki kelebekler
1495 | unicorn (noun): an imaginary horse with one horn | loc: tek boynuzlu at
  EN TS: Fact: a unicorn has one horn.
  tr TS: Bilgi: tek boynuzlu atın bir boynuzu var.
  EN FS: Fact: a unicorn has two horns.
  tr FS: Bilgi: tek boynuzlu atın iki boynuzu var.
  EN TP: a rearing unicorn
  tr TP: şaha kalkmış tek boynuzlu at
  EN FP: a sleeping unicorn
  tr FP: uyuyan tek boynuzlu at
1497 | violin (noun): a small string instrument played with a bow | loc: keman
  EN TS: The violin sits on old music.
  tr TS: Keman eski notaların üstünde duruyor.
  EN FS: The guitar sits on old music.
  tr FS: Gitar eski notaların üstünde duruyor.
  EN TP: a violin with roses
  tr TP: güllerle bir keman
  EN FP: a violin lesson
  tr FP: bir keman dersi
1498 | balloon (noun): a big bag filled with hot air that carries people | loc: balon
  EN TS: Two guys in a balloon. Ciao!
  tr TS: Balonda iki adam. Ciao!
  EN FS: Two guys on a horse. Ciao!
  tr FS: Atın üstünde iki adam. Ciao!
  EN TP: a balloon with two men
  tr TP: iki adamlı bir balon
  EN FP: a balloon with two dogs
  tr FP: iki köpekli bir balon
1499 | stem (noun): the long thin part that holds the flower | loc: sap
  EN TS: The stems are long and curly.
  tr TS: Saplar uzun ve kıvrımlı.
  EN FS: The stems are short and thick.
  tr FS: Saplar kısa ve kalın.
  EN TP: long curling stems
  tr TP: uzun, kıvrımlı saplar
  EN FP: stems in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda saplar
1501 | pour (verb): to make a liquid flow out of a container | loc: dökmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is pouring green liquid.
  tr TS: Yeşil bir sıvı döküyor.
  EN FS: She is pouring red liquid.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir sıvı döküyor.
  EN TP: pouring from a wide bowl
  tr TP: geniş bir kâseden dökmek
  EN FP: pouring tea into a cup
  tr FP: fincana çay dökmek
1502 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: gün batımı
  EN TS: Sunset for two. So sweet.
  tr TS: İki kişilik gün batımı. Çok tatlı.
  EN FS: Breakfast for two. So sweet.
  tr FS: İki kişilik kahvaltı. Çok tatlı.
  EN TP: watching the sunset together
  tr TP: birlikte gün batımını izlemek
  EN FP: a sunset in the mountains
  tr FP: dağlarda gün batımı
1504 | philosopher (noun): a person who studies big questions about life | loc: filozof
  EN TS: The philosopher has a beard.
  tr TS: Filozofun sakalı var.
  EN FS: The philosopher has a hat.
  tr FS: Filozofun şapkası var.
  EN TP: a bearded philosopher
  tr TP: sakallı bir filozof
  EN FP: a laughing philosopher
  tr FP: gülen bir filozof
1505 | supermarket (noun): a big store selling food and household goods | loc: süpermarket
  EN TS: Supermarket trip, 1950s style.
  tr TS: Süpermarket alışverişi, 1950'ler tarzı.
  EN FS: Bakery trip, 1950s style.
  tr FS: Fırın alışverişi, 1950'ler tarzı.
  EN TP: a supermarket checkout
  tr TP: süpermarket kasası
  EN FP: a supermarket car park
  tr FP: süpermarket otoparkı
1508 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: kilise
  EN TS: The church has a tall tower.
  tr TS: Kilisenin yüksek bir kulesi var.
  EN FS: The church has a tiny tower.
  tr FS: Kilisenin minicik bir kulesi var.
  EN TP: an old stone church
  tr TP: eski, taş bir kilise
  EN FP: an old stone bridge
  tr FP: eski, taş bir köprü
1510 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: çığlık atmak
  EN TS: Why is the figure screaming?
  tr TS: Figür neden çığlık atıyor?
  EN FS: Why is the figure singing?
  tr FS: Figür neden şarkı söylüyor?
  EN TP: screaming on a bridge
  tr TP: köprüde çığlık atmak
  EN FP: screaming on a roller coaster
  tr FP: hız treninde çığlık atmak
1513 | pray (verb): to speak to a god | loc: dua etmek
  EN TS: Hands pressed together to pray.
  tr TS: Eller dua etmek için birleşmiş.
  EN FS: Hands pressed together to clap.
  tr FS: Eller alkışlamak için birleşmiş.
  EN TP: hands pressed to pray
  tr TP: dua etmek için birleşen eller
  EN FP: praying with open hands
  tr FP: açık ellerle dua etmek
1514 | religion (noun): belief in a god and its traditions | loc: din
  EN TS: Religion in an old painting.
  tr TS: Eski bir tabloda din.
  EN FS: Religion in a modern cartoon.
  tr FS: Modern bir karikatürde din.
  EN TP: a painting about religion
  tr TP: din üzerine bir tablo
  EN FP: a book about religion
  tr FP: din üzerine bir kitap
1519 | pretty (adjective): nice to look at, attractive in a gentle way | loc: güzel
  EN TS: Her flowers are so pretty.
  tr TS: Çiçekleri çok güzel.
  EN FS: Her feathers are so pretty.
  tr FS: Tüyleri çok güzel.
  EN TP: pretty flowers in her hair
  tr TP: saçında güzel çiçekler
  EN FP: pretty ribbons in her hair
  tr FP: saçında güzel kurdeleler
1520 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: kıvırcık
  EN TS: Curly hair and pearls? Classy.
  tr TS: Kıvırcık saç ve inciler? Klas.
  EN FS: Short hair and pearls? Classy.
  tr FS: Kısa saç ve inciler? Klas.
  EN TP: long curly blond hair
  tr TP: uzun, kıvırcık sarı saç
  EN FP: a curly-haired dog
  tr FP: kıvırcık tüylü bir köpek
1522 | basket (noun): a woven container with handles | loc: sepet
  EN TS: She has a basket of cherries.
  tr TS: Bir sepet kirazı var.
  EN FS: She has a basket of apples.
  tr FS: Bir sepet elması var.
  EN TP: a basket of cherries
  tr TP: bir sepet kiraz
  EN FP: a dog in a basket
  tr FP: sepette bir köpek
1523 | blonde (adjective): having pale yellow hair | loc: sarışın
  EN TS: Blonde hair full of flowers.
  tr TS: Sarışın kızın saçları çiçek dolu.
  EN FS: Black hair full of flowers.
  tr FS: Esmer kızın saçları çiçek dolu.
  EN TP: long wavy blonde hair
  tr TP: uzun dalgalı saçlı bir sarışın
  EN FP: short blonde hair
  tr FP: kısa saçlı bir sarışın
1524 | hitchhike (verb): to ask drivers for a free ride with your thumb | loc: otostop yapmak
  EN TS: He is hitchhiking, and a UFO answers.
  tr TS: Otostop yapıyor ve bir UFO duruyor.
  EN FS: He is hitchhiking, and a bus answers.
  tr FS: Otostop yapıyor ve bir otobüs duruyor.
  EN TP: hitchhiking on a mountain road
  tr TP: dağ yolunda otostop yapmak
  EN FP: hitchhiking on a motorway
  tr FP: otobanda otostop yapmak
1525 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: tren
  EN TS: The train is coming at us!
  tr TS: Tren üstümüze geliyor!
  EN FS: The truck is coming at us!
  tr FS: Kamyon üstümüze geliyor!
  EN TP: a black steam train
  tr TP: siyah bir buharlı tren
  EN FP: to train for a race
  tr FP: yarış için antrenman yapmak
1526 | warrior (noun): a person who fights in battles | loc: savaşçı
  EN TS: The warrior has a helmet.
  tr TS: Savaşçının miğferi var.
  EN FS: The warrior has a shield.
  tr FS: Savaşçının kalkanı var.
  EN TP: a samurai warrior
  tr TP: bir samuray savaşçı
  EN FP: a warrior on horseback
  tr FP: at üstünde bir savaşçı
1527 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: katedral
  EN TS: The cathedral has a huge dome.
  tr TS: Katedralin kocaman bir kubbesi var.
  EN FS: The cathedral has a flat roof.
  tr FS: Katedralin düz bir çatısı var.
  EN TP: a baroque cathedral dome
  tr TP: barok bir katedral kubbesi
  EN FP: a cathedral choir singing
  tr FP: şarkı söyleyen katedral korosu
1528 | japan (noun): the East Asian country of Mount Fuji | loc: Japonya
  EN TS: Balloons over Japan!
  tr TS: Japonya'nın üstünde balonlar!
  EN FS: Birds over Japan!
  tr FS: Japonya'nın üstünde kuşlar!
  EN TP: symbols of Japan
  tr TP: Japonya'nın simgeleri
  EN FP: a map of Japan
  tr FP: bir Japonya haritası
1529 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: kule
  EN TS: Two towers, one volcano.
  tr TS: İki kule, bir yanardağ.
  EN FS: Two towers, two volcanoes.
  tr FS: İki kule, iki yanardağ.
  EN TP: two round castle towers
  tr TP: iki yuvarlak şato kulesi
  EN FP: two tall water towers
  tr FP: iki yüksek su kulesi
1530 | town (noun): a place with houses and shops, smaller than a city | loc: kasaba
  EN TS: The town is on a hill. Nice view, they say.
  tr TS: Kasaba bir tepede. Manzarası güzelmiş, öyle diyorlar.
  EN FS: The town is by the sea. Nice view, they say.
  tr FS: Kasaba deniz kenarında. Manzarası güzelmiş, öyle diyorlar.
  EN TP: an old hilltop town
  tr TP: tepede eski bir kasaba
  EN FP: a new seaside town
  tr FP: yeni bir sahil kasabası
1531 | arch (noun): a curved structure over an opening | loc: kemer
  EN TS: An arch frames the church.
  tr TS: Bir kemer kiliseyi çerçeveliyor.
  EN FS: A tree frames the church.
  tr FS: Bir ağaç kiliseyi çerçeveliyor.
  EN TP: a large pointed arch
  tr TP: büyük, sivri bir kemer
  EN FP: a large pointed tower
  tr FP: büyük, sivri bir kule
1534 | horn (noun): a hard pointed growth on an animal's head | loc: boynuz
  EN TS: Wow, one horn on each horse!
  tr TS: Vay, her atta bir boynuz var!
  EN FS: Wow, two horns on each horse!
  tr FS: Vay, her atta iki boynuz var!
  EN TP: a unicorn's long horn
  tr TP: tek boynuzlu atın uzun boynuzu
  EN FP: a car's loud horn
  tr FP: arabanın yüksek sesli kornası
1535 | upside down (adverb): with the top part at the bottom | loc: baş aşağı
  EN TS: He is upside down. So easy.
  tr TS: Baş aşağı duruyor. Çok kolay.
  EN FS: He is lying down. So easy.
  tr FS: Sırtüstü yatıyor. Çok kolay.
  EN TP: balancing upside down
  tr TP: baş aşağı dengede durmak
  EN FP: hanging upside down
  tr FP: baş aşağı asılı durmak
1537 | egypt (noun): the country of the pyramids and the Nile | loc: Mısır
  EN TS: Egypt's pharaoh has a bow.
  tr TS: Mısır firavununun bir yayı var.
  EN FS: Egypt's pharaoh has a sword.
  tr FS: Mısır firavununun bir kılıcı var.
  EN TP: a pharaoh of Egypt
  tr TP: bir Mısır firavunu
  EN FP: a pyramid in Egypt
  tr FP: Mısır'da bir piramit
1538 | column (noun): a tall upright post that holds up a building | loc: sütun
  EN TS: She is between two columns.
  tr TS: İki sütunun arasında duruyor.
  EN FS: She is between two trees.
  tr FS: İki ağacın arasında duruyor.
  EN TP: two decorated columns
  tr TP: süslü iki sütun
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  tr FP: gazetede bir sütun
1541 | chapel (noun): a small church | loc: şapel
  EN TS: Tiny chapel, snowy vibes.
  tr TS: Minik şapel, kış modu.
  EN FS: Tiny chapel, sunny vibes.
  tr FS: Minik şapel, yaz modu.
  EN TP: a snowy white chapel
  tr TP: karlı, beyaz bir şapel
  EN FP: a chapel full of guests
  tr FP: misafir dolu bir şapel
1543 | cabbage (noun): a big round vegetable with thick green leaves | loc: lahana
  EN TS: She is holding a big cabbage.
  tr TS: Kocaman bir lahana tutuyor.
  EN FS: She is holding a big pumpkin.
  tr FS: Kocaman bir balkabağı tutuyor.
  EN TP: a garden full of cabbages
  tr TP: lahana dolu bir bahçe
  EN FP: a cabbage in a pot
  tr FP: saksıda bir lahana
1544 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: çamaşır
  EN TS: She is hanging up the laundry.
  tr TS: Çamaşırları asıyor.
  EN FS: She is hanging up the flags.
  tr FS: Bayrakları asıyor.
  EN TP: hanging white laundry
  tr TP: beyaz çamaşır asmak
  EN FP: folding white laundry
  tr FP: beyaz çamaşır katlamak
1545 | queen (noun): a woman who rules a country, or a king's wife | loc: kraliçe
  EN TS: The queen's collar is huge!
  tr TS: Kraliçenin yakası kocaman!
  EN FS: The queen's dog is huge!
  tr FS: Kraliçenin köpeği kocaman!
  EN TP: a queen with a scepter
  tr TP: asalı bir kraliçe
  EN FP: a queen with a sword
  tr FP: kılıçlı bir kraliçe
1547 | holy (adjective): connected with God and religion, sacred | loc: kutsal
  EN TS: The holy man is thinking hard.
  tr TS: Kutsal adam derin derin düşünüyor.
  EN FS: The holy man is laughing hard.
  tr FS: Kutsal adam kahkahalarla gülüyor.
  EN TP: a holy man thinking
  tr TP: düşünen kutsal bir adam
  EN FP: a holy man praying
  tr FP: dua eden kutsal bir adam
1548 | window (noun): the glass opening in the side of a vehicle | loc: pencere
  EN TS: People are in every window.
  tr TS: Her pencerede insanlar var.
  EN FS: Cats are in every window.
  tr FS: Her pencerede kediler var.
  EN TP: a family in every window
  tr TP: her pencerede bir aile
  EN FP: a cat in every window
  tr FP: her pencerede bir kedi
1549 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: boya
  EN TS: Someone spilled all the paint!
  tr TS: Biri bütün boyayı dökmüş!
  EN FS: Someone spilled all the milk!
  tr FS: Biri bütün sütü dökmüş!
  EN TP: drips of paint
  tr TP: boya damlaları
  EN FP: a tin of paint
  tr FP: bir kutu boya
1551 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: gitar
  EN TS: Heaven sent us a guitar!
  tr TS: Gökler bize bir gitar gönderdi!
  EN FS: Heaven sent us a violin!
  tr FS: Gökler bize bir keman gönderdi!
  EN TP: holding up a guitar
  tr TP: gitarı havaya kaldırmak
  EN FP: tuning a guitar
  tr FP: gitar akort etmek
1554 | monk (noun): a religious man who lives simply | loc: keşiş
  EN TS: The monk has a red umbrella.
  tr TS: Keşişin kırmızı bir şemsiyesi var.
  EN FS: The monk has a black umbrella.
  tr FS: Keşişin siyah bir şemsiyesi var.
  EN TP: a monk in pink
  tr TP: pembe giysili bir keşiş
  EN FP: a monk in black
  tr FP: siyah giysili bir keşiş
1555 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: kılıç
  EN TS: The figure holds a big sword.
  tr TS: Figür büyük bir kılıç tutuyor.
  EN FS: The figure holds a big spear.
  tr FS: Figür büyük bir mızrak tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding a sword upright
  tr TP: kılıcı dik tutmak
  EN FP: a sword on the wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir kılıç
1559 | sunflower (noun): a very tall flower with a big round yellow head | loc: ayçiçeği
  EN TS: Sunflowers fill a yellow vase.
  tr TS: Ayçiçekleri sarı bir vazoyu dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Roses fill a yellow vase.
  tr FS: Güller sarı bir vazoyu dolduruyor.
  EN TP: sunflowers in a vase
  tr TP: vazoda ayçiçekleri
  EN FP: sunflowers in a field
  tr FP: tarlada ayçiçekleri
1560 | swing (noun): a seat hanging on ropes that moves back and forth | loc: salıncak
  EN TS: She is standing at a swing.
  tr TS: Bir salıncağın yanında duruyor.
  EN FS: She is standing at a gate.
  tr FS: Bir kapının yanında duruyor.
  EN TP: a rope swing
  tr TP: halattan bir salıncak
  EN FP: a swing dance
  tr FP: bir swing dansı
1562 | cowboy (noun): a man who rides a horse and looks after cattle | loc: kovboy
  EN TS: The cowboy is riding into the sunset.
  tr TS: Kovboy gün batımına doğru at sürüyor.
  EN FS: The cowboy is riding into the sea.
  tr FS: Kovboy denize doğru at sürüyor.
  EN TP: a cowboy on a horse
  tr TP: at üstünde bir kovboy
  EN FP: a cowboy on a bull
  tr FP: boğa üstünde bir kovboy
1565 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: dişli çark
  EN TS: She is made of rusty gears.
  tr TS: Kadın paslı dişli çarklardan yapılmış.
  EN FS: She is made of rusty chains.
  tr FS: Kadın paslı zincirlerden yapılmış.
  EN TP: rusty metal gears
  tr TP: paslı metal dişli çarklar
  EN FP: rusty metal chains
  tr FP: paslı metal zincirler
1567 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: uçak
  EN TS: The plane is climbing up!
  tr TS: Uçak yükseliyor!
  EN FS: The plane is going down!
  tr FS: Uçak alçalıyor!
  EN TP: a plane climbing up
  tr TP: yükselen bir uçak
  EN FP: a plane coming down
  tr FP: alçalan bir uçak
1568 | sail (verb): to travel on water in a boat pushed by the wind | loc: yelkenle gitmek
  EN TS: It is sailing under the moon.
  tr TS: Ayın altında yelkenle gidiyor.
  EN FS: It is sailing under the sun.
  tr FS: Güneşin altında yelkenle gidiyor.
  EN TP: to sail at night
  tr TP: gece yelkenle gitmek
  EN FP: to sail in the sun
  tr FP: güneşte yelkenle gitmek
1569 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: portre
  EN TS: It's a crosshatched portrait.
  tr TS: Bu, çapraz taramalı bir portre.
  EN FS: It's a watercolour portrait.
  tr FS: Bu, suluboya bir portre.
  EN TP: a pen-and-ink portrait
  tr TP: mürekkep kalemle bir portre
  EN FP: a portrait in oil paint
  tr FP: yağlı boya bir portre
1574 | lantern (noun): a lamp in a case that you hang or carry | loc: fener
  EN TS: A lantern hangs from a branch.
  tr TS: Bir daldan bir fener sarkıyor.
  EN FS: A lantern hangs from a roof.
  tr FS: Bir çatıdan bir fener sarkıyor.
  EN TP: a lantern on a chain
  tr TP: zincirde bir fener
  EN FP: a lantern in her hand
  tr FP: elinde bir fener
1575 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: çift
  EN TS: The couple is hugging.
  tr TS: Çift sarılıyor.
  EN FS: The couple is fighting.
  tr FS: Çift kavga ediyor.
  EN TP: a couple under the moon
  tr TP: ayın altında bir çift
  EN FP: a couple on a beach
  tr FP: plajda bir çift
1576 | dream (noun): the pictures you see while you are asleep | loc: rüya
  EN TS: In her dream, she swings from the moon.
  tr TS: Rüyasında aydan sallanıyor.
  EN FS: In her dream, she swings from a tree.
  tr FS: Rüyasında bir ağaçtan sallanıyor.
  EN TP: a dream about the moon
  tr TP: ayla ilgili bir rüya
  EN FP: a dream about the sea
  tr FP: denizle ilgili bir rüya
1579 | smartphone (noun): a mobile phone that works like a small computer | loc: akıllı telefon
  EN TS: The smartphones built a house.
  tr TS: Akıllı telefonlar bir ev yapmış.
  EN FS: The books built a house.
  tr FS: Kitaplar bir ev yapmış.
  EN TP: a house of smartphones
  tr TP: akıllı telefonlardan bir ev
  EN FP: a smartphone in a pocket
  tr FP: cepte bir akıllı telefon
1581 | van (noun): a boxy road vehicle for carrying people or things | loc: minibüs
  EN TS: Van life, baby!
  tr TS: Minibüste yaşam, işte bu!
  EN FS: Tent life, baby!
  tr FS: Çadırda yaşam, işte bu!
  EN TP: a van with a surfboard
  tr TP: sörf tahtalı bir minibüs
  EN FP: a van with a bike
  tr FP: bisikletli bir minibüs
1583 | astronaut (noun): a person in a sealed suit who travels in space | loc: astronot
  EN TS: The astronaut is flying away!
  tr TS: Astronot uçup gidiyor!
  EN FS: The pilot is flying away!
  tr FS: Pilot uçup gidiyor!
  EN TP: an astronaut in space
  tr TP: uzayda bir astronot
  EN FP: an astronaut on the moon
  tr FP: Ay'da bir astronot
1584 | dance (verb): to move your body to music | loc: dans etmek
  EN TS: Her skirt is dancing too.
  tr TS: Eteği de dans ediyor.
  EN FS: Her dog is dancing too.
  tr FS: Köpeği de dans ediyor.
  EN TP: dancing in a red skirt
  tr TP: kırmızı etekle dans etmek
  EN FP: to dance in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda dans etmek
1585 | white (adjective): having the color of snow or milk | loc: beyaz
  EN TS: There are five white roses.
  tr TS: Beş beyaz gül var.
  EN FS: There are five red roses.
  tr FS: Beş kırmızı gül var.
  EN TP: five white rose blossoms
  tr TP: beş beyaz gül çiçeği
  EN FP: white roses in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda beyaz güller
1586 | pollution (noun): dirt and smoke that make air and water unhealthy | loc: kirlilik
  EN TS: Pollution everywhere you look.
  tr TS: Nereye baksan kirlilik.
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere you look.
  tr FS: Nereye baksan çiçek.
  EN TP: pollution from a factory
  tr TP: fabrikadan gelen kirlilik
  EN FP: pollution from a ship
  tr FP: gemiden gelen kirlilik
1589 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: üzgün
  EN TS: This person looks sad.
  tr TS: Bu kişi üzgün görünüyor.
  EN FS: This person looks happy.
  tr FS: Bu kişi mutlu görünüyor.
  EN TP: a sad orange-haired figure
  tr TP: turuncu saçlı üzgün bir figür
  EN FP: a sad blue-haired figure
  tr FP: mavi saçlı üzgün bir figür
1590 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: kapüşon
  EN TS: The hood is full of stars.
  tr TS: Kapüşon yıldızlarla dolu.
  EN FS: The hood is full of flowers.
  tr FS: Kapüşon çiçeklerle dolu.
  EN TP: a starry hood
  tr TP: yıldızlı bir kapüşon
  EN FP: a hood over the eyes
  tr FP: gözlere inen bir kapüşon
1591 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: deniz feneri
  EN TS: This lighthouse has stripes.
  tr TS: Bu deniz feneri çizgili.
  EN FS: This lighthouse has spots.
  tr FS: Bu deniz feneri puantiyeli.
  EN TP: a striped lighthouse
  tr TP: çizgili bir deniz feneri
  EN FP: a striped beach hut
  tr FP: çizgili bir plaj kulübesi
1592 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: robot
  EN TS: The robot has blue lips. Cold?
  tr TS: Robotun dudakları mavi. Üşüyor mu?
  EN FS: The robot has red lips. Cold?
  tr FS: Robotun dudakları kırmızı. Üşüyor mu?
  EN TP: a metal robot head
  tr TP: metal bir robot kafası
  EN FP: a robot vacuum
  tr FP: bir robot süpürge
1593 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: saç kesimi
  EN TS: Love that blue haircut!
  tr TS: Bu mavi saç kesimine bayıldım!
  EN FS: Love that blue hat!
  tr FS: Bu mavi şapkaya bayıldım!
  EN TP: a teal bob haircut
  tr TP: turkuaz küt saç kesimi
  EN FP: a haircut in a salon
  tr FP: kuaförde saç kesimi
1595 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: piramit
  EN TS: Two pyramids. Very pointy.
  tr TS: İki piramit. Çok sivri.
  EN FS: Two towers. Very pointy.
  tr FS: İki kule. Çok sivri.
  EN TP: two brown pyramids
  tr TP: iki kahverengi piramit
  EN FP: a pyramid of oranges
  tr FP: portakallardan bir piramit
1596 | russia (noun): the largest country in the world, east of Europe | loc: Rusya
  EN TS: The moon shines over Russia.
  tr TS: Ay, Rusya'nın üstünde parlıyor.
  EN FS: The sun shines over Russia.
  tr FS: Güneş, Rusya'nın üstünde parlıyor.
  EN TP: a church in Russia
  tr TP: Rusya'da bir kilise
  EN FP: a palace in Russia
  tr FP: Rusya'da bir saray
1597 | underwater (adverb): below the surface of the water | loc: su altında
  EN TS: Oops, his face is underwater!
  tr TS: Eyvah, yüzü su altında!
  EN FS: Oops, his face is in the sand!
  tr FS: Eyvah, yüzü kumda!
  EN TP: a dog underwater
  tr TP: su altında bir köpek
  EN FP: a dog above the water
  tr FP: suyun üstünde bir köpek
1598 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: İsa
  EN TS: Jesus is raising one hand.
  tr TS: İsa bir elini kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: Jesus is raising both hands.
  tr FS: İsa iki elini de kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: Jesus giving a blessing
  tr TP: kutsayan İsa
  EN FP: Jesus carrying a cross
  tr FP: haç taşıyan İsa
1600 | canal (noun): a man-made water street for boats | loc: kanal
  EN TS: A small boat is on the canal.
  tr TS: Kanalda küçük bir tekne var.
  EN FS: A big ship is on the canal.
  tr FS: Kanalda büyük bir gemi var.
  EN TP: a boat on the canal
  tr TP: kanalda bir tekne
  EN FP: a boat on the lake
  tr FP: gölde bir tekne
1603 | oil (noun): the black fuel drilled from under the sea | loc: petrol
  EN TS: They drill for oil out at sea.
  tr TS: Açık denizde petrol sondajı yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They drill for oil on a hill.
  tr FS: Bir tepede petrol sondajı yapıyorlar.
  EN TP: an oil platform at sea
  tr TP: denizde bir petrol platformu
  EN FP: oil in a frying pan
  tr FP: tavada yağ
1609 | ballet (noun): the classical dance with graceful poses | loc: bale
  EN TS: She is doing ballet on a rock!
  tr TS: Kayanın üstünde bale yapıyor!
  EN FS: She is doing ballet on a boat!
  tr FS: Teknenin üstünde bale yapıyor!
  EN TP: ballet on a rock
  tr TP: kayanın üstünde bale
  EN FP: ballet in a studio
  tr FP: stüdyoda bale
1610 | balcony (noun): an open platform with a railing on a building | loc: balkon
  EN TS: The moon lights the balcony.
  tr TS: Ay balkonu aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: A lamp lights the balcony.
  tr FS: Bir lamba balkonu aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: a moonlit balcony
  tr TP: ay ışığında bir balkon
  EN FP: a sunny balcony
  tr FP: güneşli bir balkon
1611 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: güvercin
  EN TS: A dove is flying in the light.
  tr TS: Işığın içinde bir güvercin uçuyor.
  EN FS: A crow is flying in the light.
  tr FS: Işığın içinde bir karga uçuyor.
  EN TP: a dove with open wings
  tr TP: kanatlarını açmış bir güvercin
  EN FP: a dove in a cage
  tr FP: kafeste bir güvercin
1612 | korea (noun): a country in East Asia, next to China and Japan | loc: Kore
  EN TS: Kids from Korea are waving.
  tr TS: Kore'den çocuklar el sallıyor.
  EN FS: Kids from Korea are dancing.
  tr FS: Kore'den çocuklar dans ediyor.
  EN TP: kids from Korea waving
  tr TP: Kore'den el sallayan çocuklar
  EN FP: kids from Korea singing
  tr FP: Kore'den şarkı söyleyen çocuklar
1613 | rocket (noun): a vehicle shaped like a tube that flies into space | loc: roket
  EN TS: Three rockets are taking off!
  tr TS: Üç roket havalanıyor!
  EN FS: Two rockets are taking off!
  tr FS: İki roket havalanıyor!
  EN TP: rockets rising at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında yükselen roketler
  EN FP: a rocket landing at sunset
  tr FP: gün batımında inen bir roket
1614 | spain (noun): a country in south-west Europe next to Portugal | loc: İspanya
  EN TS: Bulls are running in Spain!
  tr TS: İspanya'da boğalar koşuyor!
  EN FS: Horses are running in Spain!
  tr FS: İspanya'da atlar koşuyor!
  EN TP: bulls running in Spain
  tr TP: İspanya'da koşan boğalar
  EN FP: horses racing in Spain
  tr FP: İspanya'da yarışan atlar
1617 | angel (noun): a holy winged being that protects people | loc: melek
  EN TS: The angel is guiding a child.
  tr TS: Melek bir çocuğa yol gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The angel is guiding a lamb.
  tr FS: Melek bir kuzuya yol gösteriyor.
  EN TP: an angel guiding a child
  tr TP: çocuğa yol gösteren bir melek
  EN FP: an angel playing a harp
  tr FP: arp çalan bir melek
1618 | angel (noun): a holy winged being that protects people | loc: melek
  EN TS: Angels are flying around him.
  tr TS: Etrafında melekler uçuşuyor.
  EN FS: Birds are flying around him.
  tr FS: Etrafında kuşlar uçuşuyor.
  EN TP: winged angels in the clouds
  tr TP: bulutlarda kanatlı melekler
  EN FP: angels on a Christmas tree
  tr FP: yılbaşı ağacında melekler
1619 | sail (noun): the large cloth that catches the wind | loc: yelken
  EN TS: The big ship has full sails.
  tr TS: Büyük geminin yelkenleri fora.
  EN FS: The big ship has no sails.
  tr FS: Büyük geminin hiç yelkeni yok.
  EN TP: full sails in the wind
  tr TP: rüzgârla şişmiş yelkenler
  EN FP: torn sails in the wind
  tr FP: rüzgârda yırtık yelkenler
1620 | heaven (noun): the holy place above the clouds with angels | loc: cennet
  EN TS: Heaven looks very busy today.
  tr TS: Cennet bugün epey kalabalık görünüyor.
  EN FS: Heaven looks very empty today.
  tr FS: Cennet bugün epey boş görünüyor.
  EN TP: cherubs flying in heaven
  tr TP: cennette uçan melekçikler
  EN FP: a heaven full of saints
  tr FP: azizlerle dolu bir cennet
1623 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: gökdelen
  EN TS: So many skyscrapers!
  tr TS: Ne çok gökdelen!
  EN FS: So many bridges!
  tr FS: Ne çok köprü!
  EN TP: skyscrapers at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta gökdelenler
  EN FP: a skyscraper being built
  tr FP: inşa halindeki bir gökdelen
1625 | surfboard (noun): the long board you stand on to ride waves | loc: sörf tahtası
  EN TS: The surfer holds a surfboard.
  tr TS: Sörfçü bir sörf tahtası tutuyor.
  EN FS: The surfer holds a guitar.
  tr FS: Sörfçü bir gitar tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding a surfboard upright
  tr TP: sörf tahtasını dik tutmak
  EN FP: riding a surfboard on waves
  tr FP: dalgalarda sörf tahtasıyla kaymak
1629 | pineapple (noun): a big sweet tropical fruit with spiky skin | loc: ananas
  EN TS: Just one pineapple. So lonely.
  tr TS: Tek bir ananas. Çok yalnız.
  EN FS: Just one banana. So lonely.
  tr FS: Tek bir muz. Çok yalnız.
  EN TP: a single upright pineapple
  tr TP: dik duran tek bir ananas
  EN FP: a pineapple cut in slices
  tr FP: dilimlenmiş bir ananas
1630 | octopus (noun): the sea animal with eight long arms | loc: ahtapot
  EN TS: The octopus has eight arms. I counted.
  tr TS: Ahtapotun sekiz kolu var. Saydım.
  EN FS: The octopus has six arms. I counted.
  tr FS: Ahtapotun altı kolu var. Saydım.
  EN TP: an octopus with eight arms
  tr TP: sekiz kollu bir ahtapot
  EN FP: an octopus in a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bir ahtapot
1631 | witch (noun): a woman with magic powers in stories | loc: cadı
  EN TS: The witch has a broom. Smart.
  tr TS: Cadının bir süpürgesi var. Zekice.
  EN FS: The witch has a cat. Smart.
  tr FS: Cadının bir kedisi var. Zekice.
  EN TP: a witch with her broom
  tr TP: süpürgesiyle bir cadı
  EN FP: a witch on her broom
  tr FP: süpürgesinin üstünde bir cadı
1633 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: heykel
  EN TS: This statue is watching you.
  tr TS: Bu heykel seni izliyor.
  EN FS: This dog is watching you.
  tr FS: Bu köpek seni izliyor.
  EN TP: a gargoyle statue
  tr TP: bir gargoyl heykeli
  EN FP: a horse statue
  tr FP: bir at heykeli
1635 | mermaid (noun): a storybook woman with a fish tail | loc: deniz kızı
  EN TS: Mermaid tail? Totally green.
  tr TS: Deniz kızı kuyruğu mu? Tamamen yeşil.
  EN FS: Mermaid tail? Totally blue.
  tr FS: Deniz kızı kuyruğu mu? Tamamen mavi.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon mermaid
  tr TP: gülümseyen çizgi film deniz kızı
  EN FP: a mermaid on a rock
  tr FP: kayanın üstünde bir deniz kızı
1638 | curtain (noun): a piece of cloth that hangs across a window | loc: perde
  EN TS: Curtains frame a moonlit sea.
  tr TS: Perdeler ay ışıklı bir denizi çerçeveliyor.
  EN FS: Curtains frame a sunny sea.
  tr FS: Perdeler güneşli bir denizi çerçeveliyor.
  EN TP: heavy purple curtains
  tr TP: ağır, mor perdeler
  EN FP: heavy purple carpets
  tr FP: ağır, mor halılar
1639 | stable (noun): a building where farm animals are kept | loc: ahır
  EN TS: Fact: the baby is in a stable.
  tr TS: Bilgi: bebek bir ahırda.
  EN FS: Fact: the baby is in a castle.
  tr FS: Bilgi: bebek bir şatoda.
  EN TP: a baby in a stable
  tr TP: ahırda bir bebek
  EN FP: a horse in a stable
  tr FP: ahırda bir at
1641 | scary (adjective): making you feel afraid | loc: korkutucu
  EN TS: A scary clown and a crow.
  tr TS: Korkutucu bir palyaço ve bir karga.
  EN FS: A scary clown and a cat.
  tr FS: Korkutucu bir palyaço ve bir kedi.
  EN TP: scary eyes in the sky
  tr TP: gökyüzünde korkutucu gözler
  EN FP: a scary movie night
  tr FP: korkutucu bir film gecesi
1642 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: köy
  EN TS: The village sky is red.
  tr TS: Köyün gökyüzü kırmızı.
  EN FS: The village sky is blue.
  tr FS: Köyün gökyüzü mavi.
  EN TP: a village at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir köy
  EN FP: a village under deep snow
  tr FP: karlar altında bir köy
1643 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: şapka
  EN TS: He wears a cowboy hat.
  tr TS: Kovboy şapkası takıyor.
  EN FS: He wears a baseball cap.
  tr FS: Beyzbol şapkası takıyor.
  EN TP: a wide cowboy hat
  tr TP: geniş bir kovboy şapkası
  EN FP: a wide straw hat
  tr FP: geniş bir hasır şapka
1644 | armor (noun): metal clothing that protects a fighter | loc: zırh
  EN TS: The knight wears full armor.
  tr TS: Şövalye tam zırh giymiş.
  EN FS: The knight wears no armor.
  tr FS: Şövalyenin üstünde hiç zırh yok.
  EN TP: a knight in metal armor
  tr TP: metal zırhlı bir şövalye
  EN FP: a knight without armor
  tr FP: zırhsız bir şövalye
1647 | postcard (noun): a card with a picture you write on and send | loc: kartpostal
  EN TS: A woman is on the postcard.
  tr TS: Kartpostalda bir kadın var.
  EN FS: A man is on the postcard.
  tr FS: Kartpostalda bir adam var.
  EN TP: an old torn postcard
  tr TP: eski, yırtık bir kartpostal
  EN FP: a postcard of a beach
  tr FP: plajlı bir kartpostal
1649 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: renkli
  EN TS: Everything here is colorful!
  tr TS: Burada her şey çok renkli!
  EN FS: Everything here is grey!
  tr FS: Burada her şey gri!
  EN TP: a colorful rainbow path
  tr TP: renkli bir gökkuşağı yolu
  EN FP: a colorful umbrella
  tr FP: renkli bir şemsiye
1650 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: uçurum
  EN TS: Nice castle, scary cliff.
  tr TS: Şato güzel, uçurum korkutucu.
  EN FS: Nice castle, scary bridge.
  tr FS: Şato güzel, köprü korkutucu.
  EN TP: a chateau on a cliff
  tr TP: uçurumda bir şato
  EN FP: a cliff above the sea
  tr FP: denizin üstünde bir uçurum
1651 | cloak (noun): a long loose coat with no sleeves | loc: pelerin
  EN TS: Her blue cloak has stars.
  tr TS: Mavi pelerininde yıldızlar var.
  EN FS: Her red cloak has stars.
  tr FS: Kırmızı pelerininde yıldızlar var.
  EN TP: a star-covered blue cloak
  tr TP: yıldızlarla kaplı mavi pelerin
  EN FP: a cloak made of feathers
  tr FP: tüylerden bir pelerin
1652 | touch (verb): to put your fingers on something gently | loc: dokunmak
  EN TS: She will touch the butterfly!
  tr TS: Kelebeğe dokunacak!
  EN FS: She will touch the bird!
  tr FS: Kuşa dokunacak!
  EN TP: to touch a glowing butterfly
  tr TP: parlayan bir kelebeğe dokunmak
  EN FP: to catch a glowing butterfly
  tr FP: parlayan bir kelebeği yakalamak
1653 | goldfish (noun): a small orange fish people keep as a pet | loc: japon balığı
  EN TS: The cat wants the goldfish...
  tr TS: Kedi japon balığını istiyor...
  EN FS: The cat wants the bird...
  tr FS: Kedi kuşu istiyor...
  EN TP: a goldfish in a bowl
  tr TP: fanusta bir japon balığı
  EN FP: a goldfish in a pond
  tr FP: havuzda bir japon balığı
1655 | crown (noun): a gold ring worn on the head by a king or queen | loc: taç | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Wow, her crown is so tall!
  tr TS: Vay, tacı ne kadar uzun!
  EN FS: Wow, her crown is so small!
  tr FS: Vay, tacı ne kadar küçük!
  EN TP: a tall golden crown
  tr TP: uzun, altın bir taç
  EN FP: a small silver crown
  tr FP: küçük, gümüş bir taç
1656 | lips (noun): the two soft edges of your mouth | loc: dudaklar
  EN TS: Her lips are red.
  tr TS: Dudakları kırmızı.
  EN FS: Her lips are blue.
  tr FS: Dudakları mavi.
  EN TP: shiny red lips
  tr TP: parlak kırmızı dudaklar
  EN FP: lips on a glass
  tr FP: bardağa değen dudaklar
1658 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: karanlık
  EN TS: Dark stone, red roses, cool.
  tr TS: Karanlık taş, kırmızı güller, havalı.
  EN FS: Dark stone, white roses, cool.
  tr FS: Karanlık taş, beyaz güller, havalı.
  EN TP: a dark gothic archway
  tr TP: karanlık, gotik bir kemer
  EN FP: a dark forest path
  tr FP: karanlık bir orman yolu
1660 | treasure (noun): a store of gold, jewels and valuable things | loc: hazine
  EN TS: A chest full of treasure!
  tr TS: Hazine dolu bir sandık!
  EN FS: A chest full of bottles!
  tr FS: Şişe dolu bir sandık!
  EN TP: an open treasure chest
  tr TP: açık bir hazine sandığı
  EN FP: a treasure map on paper
  tr FP: kâğıtta bir hazine haritası
1661 | time (noun): what clocks measure, in hours and minutes | loc: zaman
  EN TS: The time is a bit unclear.
  tr TS: Zaman biraz belirsiz.
  EN FS: The map is a bit unclear.
  tr FS: Harita biraz belirsiz.
  EN TP: telling the time
  tr TP: zamanı göstermek
  EN FP: a time machine
  tr FP: bir zaman makinesi
1664 | priest (noun): a man who leads services in a church | loc: rahip
  EN TS: The priest is listening.
  tr TS: Rahip dinliyor.
  EN FS: The priest is singing.
  tr FS: Rahip şarkı söylüyor.
  EN TP: a priest in a confessional
  tr TP: günah çıkarma odasında rahip
  EN FP: a priest at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde bir rahip
1665 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: antik
  EN TS: She is in an ancient temple.
  tr TS: Antik bir tapınakta duruyor.
  EN FS: She is in an ancient castle.
  tr FS: Antik bir şatoda duruyor.
  EN TP: an ancient Egyptian temple
  tr TP: antik bir Mısır tapınağı
  EN FP: an ancient Greek temple
  tr FP: antik bir Yunan tapınağı
1666 | pharaoh (noun): a king of ancient Egypt | loc: firavun
  EN TS: A cobra sits on the pharaoh.
  tr TS: Firavunun üstünde bir kobra duruyor.
  EN FS: A falcon sits on the pharaoh.
  tr FS: Firavunun üstünde bir şahin duruyor.
  EN TP: a pharaoh in profile
  tr TP: profilden bir firavun
  EN FP: a pharaoh on a throne
  tr FP: tahtında bir firavun
1667 | paris (noun): the capital city of France | loc: Paris
  EN TS: Paris at night. Pure magic!
  tr TS: Geceleri Paris. Büyü gibi!
  EN FS: Paris at noon. Pure magic!
  tr FS: Öğlen Paris. Büyü gibi!
  EN TP: Paris at night
  tr TP: gece Paris
  EN FP: Paris in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda Paris
1669 | wing (noun): a movable body part used for flying | loc: kanat
  EN TS: Two wings, but the statue can't fly.
  tr TS: İki kanat var ama heykel uçamıyor.
  EN FS: Four wings, but the statue can't fly.
  tr FS: Dört kanat var ama heykel uçamıyor.
  EN TP: two feathered wings
  tr TP: iki tüylü kanat
  EN FP: two plane wings
  tr FP: iki uçak kanadı
1670 | london (noun): the capital city of England | loc: Londra
  EN TS: A red bus in London. Classic.
  tr TS: Londra'da kırmızı bir otobüs. Klasik.
  EN FS: A red car in London. Classic.
  tr FS: Londra'da kırmızı bir araba. Klasik.
  EN TP: a red bus in London
  tr TP: Londra'da kırmızı bir otobüs
  EN FP: a red bus in Paris
  tr FP: Paris'te kırmızı bir otobüs
1672 | prague (noun): the capital city of the Czech Republic | loc: Prag
  EN TS: Prague glows at dusk.
  tr TS: Prag alacakaranlıkta parlıyor.
  EN FS: Prague glows at noon.
  tr FS: Prag öğlen parlıyor.
  EN TP: Prague castle at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta Prag Kalesi
  EN FP: Prague castle in snow
  tr FP: karda Prag Kalesi
1674 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: mor
  EN TS: Purple sky, purple hills.
  tr TS: Mor gökyüzü, mor tepeler.
  EN FS: Purple sky, green hills.
  tr FS: Mor gökyüzü, yeşil tepeler.
  EN TP: a purple starry sky
  tr TP: mor, yıldızlı bir gökyüzü
  EN FP: a purple flower field
  tr FP: mor bir çiçek tarlası
1675 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: yalnız
  EN TS: He stands alone by a tree.
  tr TS: Bir ağacın yanında yalnız duruyor.
  EN FS: He stands alone by a house.
  tr FS: Bir evin yanında yalnız duruyor.
  EN TP: alone in an empty field
  tr TP: boş bir tarlada yalnız
  EN FP: alone in an empty room
  tr FP: boş bir odada yalnız
